<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89117-0034 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-17-89.f2.A1033</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 10 / Tuesday, January 17, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Minerals Management Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">30 CFR Part 250</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Oil and Gas and Sulphur Operations in the Outer Continental Shelf,California</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Minerals Management Service, Interior.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The proposed rule would establish special emission controlrequirements for Outer Continental Shelf (OCS) facilities off the coastof California under the provisions of section 5(a)(8) of the OCS LandsAct, as amended. The application of the provisions of proposed andSection;250.47 to OCS facilities off the coast of California would supersede therequirements found in 30 CFR 250.45 and 250.46. The requirements in andSection;andSection;250.45 and 250.46 would continue to apply to OCS facilities off the coastof States other than California. This action is taken to address problemsregarding air quality which are unique to California. The objective ofthe proposed rule is to prevent or mitigate any significant adverse impacton onshore air quality as a result of oil and gas operations conductedon Federal leases in the OCS adjacent to the State of California.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be hand delivered or postmarked no later thanFebruary 16, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Comments should be hand delivered or mailed to the Departmentof the Interior; Minerals Management Service; 12203 Sunrise Valley Drive;Mail Stop 646; Reston, Virginia 22091; Attention: Gerald D. Rhodes; telephone(703) 648-7816; (FTS) 959-7816.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Gerald D. Rhodes; Chief, Branchof Rules, Orders, and Standards; Minerals Management Service; 12203 SunriseValley Drive; Mail Stop 646; Reston, Virginia 22091; telephone (703) 648-7816,(FTS) 959-7816.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction</ITAG>This Notice consists of five major parts: A two-part preamble followedby the text for the proposed rule and the appendices for the rule. Thepreamble contains: a) Background information pertinent to this rulemakingin general and b) information pertinent to the proposed rule. The textof the proposed rule follows the preamble with the two appendices thatare pertinent to it. The public is asked to comment on the proposed ruleand its appendices as a whole and to provide answers to the questions setforth at the end of the preamble.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Activities associated with the exploration for and development of oil andgas resources emit air pollutants. In particular, exploration and developmentactivities in the OCS emit carbon monoxide (CO), particulate matter (totalsuspended particulates (TSP) and (PM<T2>10</T2>)), sulfur dioxide (SO<T2>2</T2>), nitrogen oxides (NO<T2>x</T2>), and volatile organic compounds (VOC). Once in the atmosphere,NO<T2>x</T2>, and VOC react photochemically to produce ozone.The largest amount of emissions comes from power generation equipment onOCS platforms, such as gas turbines and diesel engines, used to run drillingrigs and pumps. Most of the emissions are NO<T2>x</T2>. The exact amount of NO<T2>x</T2> emitted from these sources depends upon the operating characteristicsof the turbine or engine, such as the size, type, and period of use, aswell as the type of fuel burned.VOC emissions, mostly hydrocarbons, come from fugitive sources. Fugitivesources include valves, flanges, and pumping equipment through which oiland gas are processed and transported.The amount of SO<T2>2</T2> emissions depends largely on the hydrogen sulfide (H<T2>2</T2>S) content of the gas, if any, produced with the crude oil, theremoval and treatment of the H<T2>2</T2>S, and the sulfur content of the fuels used.Section 5(a)(8) of the OCS Lands Act directs the Secretary of the Interior(Secretary) to adopt rules for compliance with the national ambient airquality standards (NAAQS) pursuant to the Clean Air Act (CAA) to the extentthat activities authorized under the Act significantly affect the air qualityof any State (43 U.S.C. 1334(a)(8)). Responding to this mandate, in 1980the Department of the Interior (DOI) published final rules to regulatethe emission of air pollutants from activities authorized on the OCS underthe OCS Lands Act. The final rules were codified at 30 CFR 250.57 on March7, 1980 (45 FR 15128). The operating regulations at 30 CFR Part 250 wererevised in a final rule published on April 1, 1988, and effective on May31, 1988 (53 FR 10596). The sections governing control of air emissionsnow appear in Subpart C at 30 CFR 250.44, 250.45, and 250.46.The DOI's existing emissions control program may be described as a three-stepprocess to determine whether an OCS facility should be subject to air emissioncontrol requirements and, if so, to what extent. The first step requiresa lessee to submit an inventory of projected emissions from its facilitiesand to compare that inventory with ``allowable'' emissions levels. The``allowable'' emissions levels are based on the distance of the OCS facilityfrom the shoreline. Facilities further from shore are permitted largerallowances than those closer to shore in recognition of the fact that pollutantsare dispersed in the atmosphere. The regulations exempt OCS facilitieswith projected emissions below specified levels from further review, unlessit is determined that the emissions from an OCS facility in combinationwith the emissions from other OCS facilities in the vicinity could resultin adverse cumulative impacts on onshore air quality.The second step involves a screening procedure which requires more detailedevaluation to determine whether the emissions will exceed significancelevels. This step uses air quality computer models to predict the onshoreconcentration of pollutants emitted from OCS facilities. The models userepresentative meteorological data to calculate the onshore impacts basedon projected emissions from an OCS source and the characteristics of thatsource. If a predicted concentration is below the significance levels setforth in the rules, the OCS facility is not required to control emissions.This process is followed for all pollutants except VOC. Since there areunanswered questions concerning the regulation of VOC emissions under asimilar impact-based approach, VOC emissions are regulated pursuant toan emission-based approach.The third step determines what measures a lessee must take to control emissionsand mitigate the impact of emissions that exceed the significance levelsestablished in the governing regulations. The amount of control and mitigationimposed depends on the air quality status of the adjoining onshore area,i.e., whether it is attaining the NAAQS under the Clean Air Act. If emissionsfrom an OCS facility significantly impact an onshore area attaining theNAAQS, the rules require the lessee to install the best available controltechnology (BACT) to reduce emissions. If the emissions from an OCS facilitysignificantly impact an onshore area not attaining the NAAQS, the lesseeis required to install the BACT and to install additional control equipmentor obtain credit for emission reductions elsewhere (in the OCS or onshore)to fully mitigate the net emissions from the OCS facility to zero.On March 7, 1980, DOI also published a separate proposal for rules whichwould have governed emissions from OCS facilities located in areas offthe coast of California (45 FR 15147). These proposed rules would haveapplied lower allowable emission levels and significance levels than thelevels applicable to OCS facilities off the coast of States other thanCalifornia. The DOI withdrew the proposed rules on April 16, 1982 (47 FR16349), after considering the comments received on the proposed rules,environmental impact statements, and air quality studies.The decision not to adopt separate emission control rules for operationsin the OCS adjacent to California is being challenged in <T3>State of California v. Watt, </T3>No. 81-3234-CBM (MX) (C.D. Cal.)(second amended complaint). The Citizens for a Better Environment and theCoalition for Clean Air intervened in the lawsuit in support of the positiontaken by the State of California. The Western Oil and Gas Association intervenedin support of the position taken by the Secretary. Complainants claim thatDOI's national emission control program does not take into account theunique situation the emission of pollutants in the OCS off the coast ofCalifornia present to the resolution of California's air quality problems.In the course of the litigation, DOI opened the record to obtain informationthat could be used to develop emissions control requirements that couldbe applicable to OCS facilities that may adversely affect onshore air qualityin California. This was done by publication of an Advance Notice of ProposedRulemaking (ANPR) on January 7, 1985 (50 FR 838). The ANPR set forth ageneral regulatory framework, requested comments on the desirability ofvarious elements of the general regulatory framework, and presented suggestionson a wide range of issues.The comments received in response to the ANPR included a suggestion thatDOI use a mediator to negotiate with interested groups rules to governair emissions from OCS facilities adjacent to California. The DOI decidedto investigate and implement the suggestion. It retained an independentorganization, the Mediation Institute, to assess whether negotiated rulemakingamong the parties to the lawsuit and others was worth pursuing. With theaid of the Mediation Institute, direct negotiations began between DOI andother interested parties in September 1986. The participants in the lawsuit and others identified by the MediationInstitute as needed parties in the negotiations were organized into fivecoalitions: Local, State, and Federal governments, as well as industryand environmental groups. Within the local government coalition were representativesfrom air pollution control districts and elected officials. The State governmentcoalition included representatives from California's Air Resources Board,the California Coastal Commission, and the State Attorney General's office.The Federal Government coalition included representatives from DOI, theEnvironmental Protection Agency (EPA), the Department of Energy, the Officeof Management and Budget, and the Department of Justice. Industry's coalitionincluded representatives from the Western Oil and Gas Association and officialsfrom various Federal lessees operating in the OCS off the coast of California.The environmental coalition included representatives from the Citizensfor a Better Environment, the Coalition for Clean Air, the Natural ResourcesDefense Council, the Sierra Club, and environmental and citizen groupsin Santa Barbara. To assist the coalitions at the outset and throughout the negotiations,three working groups with technical expertise were formed. One workinggroup focused on the availability and effectiveness of various technologiesdesigned to control air emissions at their source; the second working groupdeveloped information on different computer models for predicting onshoreair pollutant concentrations; and the third working group developed ideasfor innovative approaches to the mitigation of air emissions. Representativesfrom each of the coalitions served on the working groups. Later, the coalitionsagreed to establish a fourth working group to assist in developing policychoices for the issues under study. The coalitions' charge was to come to a consensus on proposed rules governingair emissions from OCS oil and gas facilities located off the coast ofCalifornia. If consensus was achieved, the Secretary was prepared to publishthat agreement as the basis for a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPR) andrequest comments on the specifics of the proposal. After considering thecomments and recommendations received on the NPR, the Secretary would developand publish a Notice of Final Rule (NFR) or take such other action as heconsidered appropriate. During the negotiated rulemaking effort, the coalitions gathered substantialamounts of information and came to a better understanding of the meansthat local and State jurisdictions in California are using to address theironshore air quality problems. The negotiated rulemaking effort producedvaluable technical information on emissions control technologies, innovativeapproaches to the mitigation of impacts, and computer models for predictingonshore impacts of OCS emissions. Further, the effort led to a better understandingof various parties' concerns about the interrelationship between industrialactivity onshore and OCS oil and gas development activities. In July 1988, representatives of the coalitions appeared to be near agreementon the concepts to be included in the rule, and asked DOI to prepare adraft rulemaking package. In August 1988, the coalitions met to reviewthe package. When it became clear that the coalitions disagreed over thedetails, DOI asked each to submit comments on the August draft by the endof September. After reviewing the comments of the coalitions and holding further discussionswith the negotiating parties, DOI determined that the negotiation had servedas many of its purposes as was posssible, and that it was time to broadenthe public dialogue by publishing a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking and solicitingpublic review and comment. Although the coalitions were unable to producea consensus rule, DOI believes much has been accomplished during the twoyears of discussions.During that time, the coalitions considered many approaches to regulatingOCS emissions, some of them innovative. The following list is indicativeof the range of the major issues examined:Controlling emissions of nitrogen oxides and volatile organic compounds,which are precursors to the formation of ozone. Reviewing the need for and types of controls that might be installed onnew and existing emissions sources on the OCS. Reviewing the need for and types of controls or mitigation for emissionsfrom ``off-platform'' sources, such as crew and supply boats and tankersservicing OCS facilities. Determining the emission allowances for all pollutants.Using innovative methods to mitigate pollutant emissions, such as the mitigationfee concept. Assessing periodically the cumulative impacts of emissions from OCS sources.Developing rules to address inspections and enforcement. Defining what constitutes an ``upset'' condition and how to regulate emissionsduring upset events. Sharing annual emission inventories between DOI and onshore regulators.Regulating emissions from temporary sources, such as exploration and constructionactivities. Regulating toxic air pollutants. Expanding the list of pollutants regulated under the Clean Air Act's provisionsfor the prevention of significant deterioration of air quality. Regulating modifications to existing OCS facilities. Requiring an electrification analysis for each new OCS facility to determinewhether onshore electricity is the best source of power for the facility.Creating an advisory committee to give DOI advice on mitigation policiesand technical matters. Creating a regulatory system of ``one-stop shopping'' so that a lessee'sOCS emissions were the subject of one permit review rather than several.Throughout the discussions, the coalitions emphasized that the rule wouldrequire careful balancing of its component parts and final consensus couldbe reached only when the rule could be viewed as a complete package. Becauseeach part of the negotiated rule would be interdependent on the other parts,changes in one part would require adjustments in others. For this reasonit is important to emphasize that the coalitions have not agreed on ``any''of the elements included in this proposed rule. The DOI learned from the negotiations that some of the elements of significantconcern that were raised in the ANPR and examined during the negotiationscould not be adopted in this proposed rule. The two most significant ofthese elements were a mitigation fee program and a scheme to regulate emissionsfrom crew and supply boats. The mitigation fee program would have created a fund through which large-scaleprojects to reduce emissions of air pollutants in areas affected by OCSemissions could be financed. The fund was intended to permit projects thatotherwise could not be undertaken through the purchase of traditional offsets.These reductions would have been in addition to those reductions the localauthorities were already obligated to achieve in the State implementationplan (SIP) under the Clean Air Act. Similarly, this proposed rule does not include provisions regulating emissionsfrom crew and supply boats while they are in transit between port and Stateand Federal offshore facilities because there are many unresolvable issuesof jurisdiction over those vessels. In the remaining sections of this preamble, we discuss the requirementsof section 5(a)(8) of the OCSLA, the reasons why the Department is proposingair quality regulations applicable to activities on the OCS off California,and the components of the proposed rule. Requirements of Section 5(a)(8) As previously noted, section 5(a)(8) of the OCS Lands Act requires thatthe Secretary issue regulations for compliance with the NAAQS to the CAA(42 U.S.C. 7401 <T3>et seq.</T3>) to the extent that activities authorized under this Actsignificantly affect the air quality of any State. 43 U.S.C. 1334(a)(8).Under this provision, the Secretary's rules must protect the national primaryand secondary ambient air quality standards, adopted under section 109of the CAA, and the standards to prevent significant deterioration of airquality set forth in section 163 of that Act. <T3>See </T3>47 FR 16351 (April 16, 1982). Although DOI has the discretionto protect stricter ambient air quality standards, it is not required todo so. <T3>Ibid., </T3>pp. 16351-54. The issue of stricter State air quality standardshas been an important one in California. Here some background is necessary.Under the CAA, EPA has issued national air quality standards which arecodified in 40 CFR Part 50. The EPA standards supersede any State air qualitystandards that are less stringent but do not supersede those that are morestringent. <T3>Connecticut </T3>v. <T3>EPA, </T3>656 F.2d 902, 909 (2d Cir. 1981). California has its ownair pollution control law, and the California Air Resources Board (CARB)has adopted air quality standards. These apply Statewide, although theBoard does have the authority to create a different set of standards foreach of California's 14 air basins. Cal. Health and Safety Code, section39606(b). For the types of pollutants commonly emitted by OCS facilities, the standardspromulgated by the EPA (the Federal standards) and the CARB have some notabledifferences. California has adopted a 1-hour ambient air quality standardfor nitrogen dioxide and sulfur dioxide, while EPA has not adopted 1-hourstandards for these pollutants. California's 24-hour ambient air qualitystandards are stricter than EPA's 24-hour standards for all pollutantsfor which 24-hour standards have been established. For particulate matter,the California standard is 100 microgams per cubic meter (mg/m3) averagedover 24 hours; the Federal standard is 150 mg/m3. For SO<T2>2</T2> the California standard is 131 mg/m3 averaged over 24 hours;the Federal standard is 365 mg/m3. California has set standards for someair pollutants, such as sulfates, hydrogen sulfide, the vinyl chloride,that have no corresponding Federal standard. Section 5(a)(8) follows the CAA in not requiring emission sources locatedoutside of a State (i.e., in the OCS) meet that State's stricter-than-nationalstandards. <T3>See </T3>47 FR 16353 (April 16, 1982). It is in accord with <T3>State of Connecticut </T3>v. <T3>EPA, </T3>656 F.2d 902, 909 (2d Cir. 1981). (Despite legislative historyconcerning protection of State and local standards, the interstate pollutionprovisions of the CAA are tied to the Federal standards.) Another concept fundamental to any rule implementing section 5(a)(8) isthat of ``significance.'' The Act requires the Secretary to regulate airpollution from OCS facilities but only ``to the extent that activitiesauthorized under this Act significantly affect the air quality of any State.''43 U.S.C. 1334(a)(8). The key question is this: How much pollution is significant?To answer this question with regard to its national emission control program,DOI has looked to see how much pollution an offshore facility would contributeto the onshore air quality. In other words, it has looked to see how muchemissions from the OCS would increase the onshore <T3>ambient concentration </T3>of a given pollutant. For reasons explainedbelow, the rules governing DOI's existing national emissions control programhave defined ``significance'' as an increase in onshore ambient concentrationsequivalent to approximately 1 to 5 percent of the Federal standard forthe given pollutants. The legislative history of section 5(a)(8) confirmsthat section 5(a)(8) does not require that ``<T3>any increase</T3>'' in the onshore ambient concentration of a pollutantis considered significant. As originally introduced, section 5(a)(8) would have applied ``to the extentthat activities authorized under this Act <T3>affect </T3>the air quality of such State.'' H.R. Rep. No. 95-590,95th Cong., 1st Sess. 9 (1977). [Emphasis added] However, this languagewas amended by the Conference Committee:<ITAG tagnum="21">[Chief Counsel] BELSKY. * * * In the EPA opinion which came down April[18, 1978], they used the words ``significantly affects.'' I think thatwith that change, the language in section (8) would be the same as EPA'sdetermination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">MR. MILLER [of California]. You were suggesting that we add ``significantly''?This is a higher burden, right[?]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">MR. BELSKY. That is correct. It would show a higher burden on theState.</ITAG>Transcript of Conference on S. 9, p. 18 (June 19, 1978).The conference report clarified the intent behind the change in the bill:<ITAG tagnum="21">[S]ome activities may not have significant effects because of distancefrom shore or meteorological conditions that blow the pollution out tosea. If an OCS activity or facility is determined to have no such significanteffect * * *, the requirements of the regulations under section 5(a)(8)would not apply.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">S. Rep. No. 95-1091, 95th Cong., 2d Sess. 86 (1978).Thus, Congress plainly did not intend to require the Secretary to treateach increase in the ambient concentration of a pollutant as significant,even when the area affected already violates the national standard.When adopting the standard for significance under the national emissioncontrol program in 1980, Secretary Andrus looked to see how Congress andthe EPA had treated analogous problems. He first looked to the CAA. Insections 160 through 169A of that Act, Congress set out its plan to preventthe significant deterioration of the air quality of areas already meetingthe national standards. 42 U.S.C. 7470-7491. Its goal, in other words,was to keep clean-air areas clean. Congress provided for three classesof clean-air areas, I, II, and III. <T3>See generally Nance </T3>v. <T3>EPA, </T3>645 F.2d 701, 704 (9th Cir.), <T3>cert. den. </T3>454 U.S. 1081 (1981) (describing the three classes).Class I is subject to the toughest standards for it includes major nationalparks and wilderness areas. 42 U.S.C. 7472. A polluter, wherever its sourceis located, cannot increase the concentration of a pollutant in a ClassI area by more than the amounts set in section 163(b)(1). 42 U.S.C. 7473(b)(1).These amounts are approximately 2 to 6 percent of the national standardfor the given pollutant. Congress wanted tough protection for pristinewilderness areas but was unwilling to require that there be no effect onair quality in these areas. Put differently, Congress found that more thana 2- to 6-percent increase in the ambient concentration of a pollutantwould cause ``significant deterioration'' in these pristine areas. SecretaryAndrus relied on this policy judgment in developing the significance levelsunder the national emission control program. 45 FR 15131 (March 7, 1980).Secretary Andrus also relied on EPA's policy judgment in its ``EmissionOffset Interpretive Ruling''. 44 FR 3274 (January 16, 1979). In that ruling,EPA established its significance levels for the emissions of the inertpollutants from individual sources, no significance level was or has beenestablished for ozone. The EPA uses these levels to decide how to regulatea pollution source located in an attainment area (or an unclassified area)if its emissions would affect a nonattainment area. The EPA did not rulethat every increase in pollution was significant. Instead, it ruled that``a new or modified source will not be considered to cause or contributeto a violation of an NAAQS if the air quality impact of the source is lessthan the specified significance levels.'' 44 FR 3277 (January 16, 1979).The levels EPA established were adopted by Secretary Andrus. <T3>Compare </T3>44 FR 3283 (January 16, 1979), codified at 40 CFR Part50, Appendix S, Part III.A. (1987), with 30 CFR 250.45(e).By not treating each increase in the ambient concentration of a pollutantin a nonattainment area as significant, section 5(a)(8) again follows theCAA. In the 1977 Amendments to the CAA, Congress found that the Act hadbeen inadequate to deal with interstate air pollution and added provisionsto resolve the problem. <T3>Air Pollution Control District </T3>v. <T3>EPA, </T3>739 F.2d 1071, 1075 (6th Cir. 1984). Under section 110 ofthe Act, each State Implementation Plan (SIP) is to assure that sourceswithin the State do not prevent attainment of the national standards inneighboring States. 42 U.S.C. 7410(a)(2)(E). The Act requires certain newsources to notify ``all nearby States'' which may be affected by theiremissions. 42 U.S.C. 7426(a). The affected State has no power to veto thepermit to be given to the new source, but it may petition EPA to find thatthe source will prevent the affected State from complying with the nationalstandards. 42 U.S.C. 7426(b).The CAA does not seek to stop a source from emitting any pollution whichmay affect another State; rather, it requires only that the source mustnot significantly contribute to violations of the standards in anotherState. <T3>Air Pollution Control District, supra, </T3>at 1088-94. Indeed, underthe CAA, one court has noted that to prevent a source State from causingeven minimal impacts on its neighbor ``would be to hold one State [thesource] hostage to another's failure to enact the pollution control strategiesnecessary to conform to the requirements of the Clean Air Act.'' <T3>Connecticut </T3>v. <T3>EPA, </T3>696 F.2d 147, 164, (2d Cir. 1982).Accordingly, in a ruling on interstate pollution, EPA found that an Indianaplant, emitting sulfur dioxide into a Kentucky area that already was violatingthe SO<T2>2</T2> standard, was not preventing the Kentucky area from meetingthe Federal standard. The EPA found that the plant's ``maximum contributionto predicted violations of the 24-hour SO<T2>2</T2> standard is small (3 percent).'' 47 FR 6625 (February 16, 1982).Consequently, ``since Gallagher's [the plant's] contributions to violationsin Jefferson County [Kentucky] are so small, the agency has concluded thatemissions from the Gallagher plant are not preventing attainment and maintenanceof the SO<T2>2</T2> standards in Kentucky.'' <T3>Id.</T3>Under DOI's existing rules Federal standards, rather than those of theaffected coastal state, are followed. However, even in these rules DOIexercised its discretion in going beyond the minimum requirements announcedin the cited court cases. For example, under the national existing rulesif computer modeling showed that an OCS facility would increase pollutionby 3 percent of the NAAQS in an onshore area violating that standard, DOIwould require the polluter to reduce the net emissions of that pollutantto zero.The proposed rules, like the existing DOI rules, assure compliance withthe National Ambient Air Quality Standards. However, the proposals go muchfurther to help address the problems particular to California. The basisfor the proposed rule's stringency is explained in the next section.Uniqueness of CaliforniaAgainst this background, it is important to explain why DOI is proposingin this Notice a rule which would apply only to OCS facilities off thecoast of California. Four factors, taken together, support the considerationof separate, more stringent rules to govern control of emissions from OCSfacilities off the California coast, especially with respect to the problemof ozone.First is the severity of existing violations of the NAAQS in several onshoreareas along the California coast. Despite efforts in the last 15 yearsby coastal jurisdictions to comply with the NAAQS established under theCAA, southern California coastal communities still contend with some ofthe worst air quality in the nation. During 1986, the San Diego air districtexceeded the NAAQS for ozone on 42 days; the South Coast air district exceededthe NAAQS for ozone on 164 days; the Ventura air district exceeded theNAAQS for ozone on 59 days; the southern Santa Barbara air district exceededthe NAAQS for ozone on 1 day; and the San Francisco Bay area air districtexceeded the NAAQS for ozone on 5 days. No exceedances of the NAAQS forozone were measured in the northern Santa Barbara, San Luis Obispo, theNorth Central Coast, and North coast air districts.\1\<NOTE/> (The NAAQS for ozone is 12 parts per hundred million (pphm).)<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Summary of 1986 Air Quality Data, California Air ResourcesBoard Volume XVIII.Second, environmental, climatic, and geographic conditions along the coastof California believed to contribute to the formation and accumulationof ozone and other pollutants in coastal California to a greater degreethan is experienced in other coastal areas of the United States. Theseconditions include the presence of a largely unbroken chain of coastalhills and mountains from Mexico to Oregon landward of the narrow coastalplain. When the winds along the coast come in from the sea, the mountainsact as a barrier frequently preventing the maritime air from flowing intothe inland valleys and desert, thereby trapping pollutants originatingin the coastal areas.\2\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ <T3>See</T3> Teknekron, Inc., ``Critique of the CARB Definition of CaliforniaCoastal Waters and Discussion of the Sea Breeze/General Circulation inSouthern California,'' 52 (July 1979).In addition, especially during the summer months, conditions frequentlycreate ``temperature inversions'' which trap pollutants in the maritimeair at a low level over the coastal plain.<ITAG tagnum="21">The general [air] circulation of the [California] region is locatedunder the eastern portion of the Pacific High. This results in a prevailingnorthwesterly flow along the west-facing coast. In the northern hemisphere,northerly flow along west-facing coastlines can result in significant oceanicupwelling, thus bringing cool water to the ocean surface. This is the casealong most of the California coast north of Point Conception, leading tothe prevailing stratus and fog regimes of the summer season. The easternportions of anticyclones are also areas of subsidence, which are sinkingmotions that tend to warm the air. The warming of air aloft and coolingof surface air by the upwelled cool ocean water result in the formationof a low level temperature inversion (a condition of increasing temperaturewith elevation). The end result is a low level layer of stable and coolair, referred to as the marine layer. It is marked by a stratus and fogregime and limits the vertical advection of atmospheric pollutants andaerosols.\3\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Final EIS/R for Santa Ynez Unit Las Flores Canyon Developmentand Production Plan, P. 5-20 (June 1984).Also potentially contributing to the problem is the daily pattern of alternatingsea breezes and land breezes along the coast. On a summer morning, thesun warms the land and the air above it more rapidly than it warms thewater and the air above the water. As the air above the land heats, itrises, and marine air flows in to replace it. After sunset, the flow reverses;as the land and the air above the land cool more rapidly than the waterand the air above the water, the air above the water then rises relativeto the cooler air onshore, and the onshore air flows offshore. This dailypattern permits emissions of oxides of nitrogen and VOC from OCS facilitiesto mix onshore with emissions from onshore sources. These emissions canthen react photochemically with the sunlight during the day and move offshoreat night where more OCS emissions are added. Thus, OCS and onshore emissionscan ``slosh'' around together, trapped by the coastal mountains on oneside and the temperature inversion above the emissions move back and forthwith limited ventilation out of the coastal areas.Third is the narrowness of the continental shelf off much of the Californiacoast which will dictate near-shore development. Off the California coast,the water depth increases quickly. As a consequence, most OCS explorationand development within the next 15 years will be concentrated within 15miles of the coast. For example, the Development and Production Plan forthe Santa Ynez Unit calls for several platforms, all within 9 miles ofthe mainland. Platforms Hidalgo, Harvest, and Hermosa in the Point Arguellofield will be within 11 miles of the coast. Platforms Grace, Gilda, andGail in the Santa Clara and Sockeye fields are within 11 miles of the coast.Because the OCS off California has high potential for significant new discoveriesof oil and gas, MMS is optimistic that additional exploration and developmentactivities will occur there over the next 10-15 years. However, the closenessof these operations to shore create the potential for emissions to concentratein a smaller area and may reduce the dispersion for these emissions.Fourth is the consideration of California's own air quality standards.Under its own air pollution control law, California has adopted stricter-than-nationalstandards for ozone and several inert pollutants. While, as previouslydiscussed, DOI is not required to protect the more stringent Californiastandards in order to satisfy section 5(a)(8), DOI believes that the statestandards should be considered in developing DOI's proposal.The differences between the State and national standards has been an importantpart of the controversy over the regulation of air pollutants from OCSfacilities off California. Since at least 1976, coastal counties and theCoastal Commission have denied OCS lessees necessary authorizations onshorein order to negotiate further controls and mitigation on OCS facilities,in addition to those already required by DOI. These actions have resultedin litigation, confusion, expense, and delay. Production of needed oiland gas supplies has been postponed, and the public's revenue from itsOCS resources diminished. The DOI's previous reluctance to require special protection for California'sair quality standards stemmed from the fact that, unlike the Federal CleanAir Act, ``California statutes generally [did] not set deadlines for attainingState standards.'' 47 FR 16353 (April 16, 1982). While DOI agreed thatit would be unfair for OCS activities to significantly interfere with theState's efforts to meet the Clean Air Act's deadlines, it could perceiveno reason to place special burdens on OCS lessees to help the State meetthe distant and generalized goals of its own laws. 47 FR 16350 (April 16,1982). The situation has changed. On September 30, 1988, Governor Deukmejian signedthe California Clean Air Act of 1988, amending the State's air pollutioncontrol laws. Among the Act's many changes is a requirement for the localair pollution control districts to achieve State standards for ozone, carbonmonoxide, sulfur dioxide, and nitrogen dioxide ``by the earliest practicabledate,'' a fixed date the district is to determine subject to the reviewof CARB (California Health and Safety Code) secs. 40910 and 41500(a). Eachdistrict generally is to reduce emissions of each nonattainment pollutantby at least five percent per year. Id. sec. 40914. Additional requirementsmust be imposed in each district depending upon whether its air pollutionis determined to be ``moderate,'' ``serious,'' or ``severe.'' Id. secs.40918-40920. In light of this development, DOI believes it appropriate to minimize theeffects that OCS development may have on the State's efforts to meet itsown ambient air quality standards for inert and reactive pollutants regulatedunder this proposed rule. For this reason, among others, DOI is proposingto require lessees to install BACT on new facilities and RACT on some existingfacilities regardless of their emission contribution. In other words, controlswill be required no matter how small an OCS facility's impacts on air quality.Additional changes serving this goal are discussed in the topics below.Effective Date of New Rule The DOI has received many comments concerning the effective date of thefinal rule and how this determination should affect requirements for thefacilities installed in the OCS off the coast of California since June1980. The definitions for ``new facility'' and ``existing facility'' areintegrally linked to this determination. Comments have ranged from thedate of the publication of the Notice of Final Rulemaking (NFR) the DOIair quality rules promulgated March 7, 1980, with an effective date ofJune 2, 1980, or the date of the filing of California's lawsuit challengingthem (July 1, 1981) to 60 or 90 days after the publication of the NFR forthese proposed rules in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>The DOI expects to make the new rules effective 30 days after publicationof the NFR. The NFR will be prospective with regard to OCS facilities consideredas ``new OCS facilities''; that is, any OCS facility in a proposed plansubmitted for review after the effective date of the rule will be definedas a new OCS facility, and all other OCS facilities will be defined asexisting OCS facilities. Through the publication of this Notice, DOI seeks comments and recommendationsregarding the proposed regulatory program for the control of emissionsfrom OCS activities off the coast of California. Reviewers are remindedthat many of the provisions of the NPR are interdependent. Thus, whilecomments and recommendations regarding specific provisions are sought,comments on the proposal as a whole are especially solicited. Structure and Overview of the Proposed Rule The proposed rule regulates pollutants considered to be inert and thosethat react photochemically to form ozone. Under the provisions for theprevention of significant deterioration, TSP will be the particulate matterindicator rather than PM<T2>10</T2> (EPA, <T4>Federal Register </T4>Notice of July 1, 1987 (52 FR 24633)). The ozoneprecursors are NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC. The proposed rule sets forth a four-step process. First, lessees shallinstall BACT on new facilities and RACT on existing facilities adjacentto nonattainment areas. Second, the magnitude of any remaining emissionsfrom new facilities shall be reviewed. Third, that review shall dictatewhat further mitigation, if any, is needed for the new facilities. Fourth,the cumulative impacts from all facilities, new and existing, shall beassessed periodically for the purpose of deciding whether even furtheremission control is necessary. The proposed rule would impose different requirements on new, existing,and modified facilities on the basis of whether the pollutants being reviewedare photochemical in nature (NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC) or are the class of pollutants called ``inerts'' (NO<T2>2</T2>, SO<T2>2</T2>, CO, TSP, lead, and PM<T2>10</T2>).For new OCS facilities, lessees must install BACT on new sources associatedwith the new OCS facility, such as the power generation equipment, andRACT on existing sources associated with the new OCS facility, includingcrew and supply boats. This requirement applies regardless of whether thenew OCS facility's projected emissions exceed the emission or significance(de minimis) levels established in the proposed rule. At this initial stageof review, lessees also must analyze the feasibility of using onshore generatedelectricity to power the new facilities. The protocols governing the economiccomponent for the electrification determination are set forth in AppendixB of this Notice.The proposed rule sets forth detailed procedures for reviewing the remainingemissions after these initial stages of review and determining if furthermitigation is required. In addition, the proposed rule also requires lesseesto estimate any emissions of pollutants classified in this rule as toxicand to conduct a risk assessment if a generic assessment has not been completedby the RD.For some existing OCS facilities, the rule proposes to require the installationof RACT within 3 years.The provisions governing modification of OCS facilities require lesseesto install BACT or RACT and to compare the net emissions resulting fromthe modification with allowable levels of emission increases. The degreeof mitigation, if any, shall depend upon whether the modification is toan existing or new OCS facility and the quantity of the projected increase.The proposed rule further proposes to cross-reference certain regulationsof EPA. These include provisions governing the use of onshore sources foroffsets, the designation of onshore attainment and nonattainment areas,and the revised NAAQS for particulate matter. As in prior rulemakings,DOI has carefully reviewed and included in the proposed rule the pertinentrequirements of EPA's regulations.Finally, the proposed rule provides protection for onshore air qualitywhich would not only comply with the requirements of the OCS Lands Actbut would also provide additional protection of California's onshore airquality commensurate with the uniqueness of California's air quality problems.The proposal would govern all air pollutants with primary and secondaryNAAQS, restrict the emissions of the ozone precursors from new OCS facilities,regulate temporary sources, and require electrification analyses. Theseprovisions serve to protect California's onshore air quality. In addition,the requirement that lessees immediately install emission control technologyon new and modified OCS facilities further protects the onshore air quality.The provisions of the cumulative analysis section specifically providethe local air pollution control agencies the opportunity to petition theRD to implement possible emission control measures developed as a resultof the joint assessment conducted by the RD and the agencies.DefinitionsThe definitions applicable to the proposed rule are included as andSection;250.47(a)(2). The DOI received many comments on the definitions for therule. Commenters provided four general views on the definitions: (1) Thedefinitions should be modified to parallel more closely the State and localair quality program definitions; (2) the definitions should parallel asclosely as possible the Federal EPA definitions and those in the CAA; (3)the definitions in the existing rules were satisfactory; and (4) the definitions,though satisfactory, should be clarified in some areas.The DOI has made an effort to parallel the EPA definitions, when appropriate;to clarify definitions which may have been ambiguous; to retain those itbelieves are satisfactory; and to consider all of them in light of thedefinitions either proposed or presently used by the State and local airpollution agencies.Three terms received extensive comments: ``Facility,'' ``best availablecontrol technology,'' and ``emission offsets.'' These are discussed ingreater detail below.Definition of FacilityThe DOI has received many comments on the appropriate definition of theterm ``facility.'' Comments ranged from those suggesting very broad definitionsto those suggesting very limited definitions and addressed two key aspectsof the definition: What structures should be included, and how mobile sources,such as crew and supply boats, should be regulated.The broadest definition suggested the inclusion of all structures in anarea connected by above-water or underwater pipelines, cables or walkways,and all mobile sources when at a structure and when in transit betweenthe structure and the mobile source's port. The most limited definitionsuggested was a definition that included individual structures and mobilesources while at a structure.The existing rule defines an OCS facility as including all sources relatedto the development of or exploration for oil and gas at a single site andincludes sources such as crew and supply boats when they are located atthe facility. The DOI proposes to retain the present definition in theexisting air quality rules which includes structures that are associatedwith the production at a single site and mobile sources when they are ata structure, but clarify its provisions through a restructuring of thedefinition.The provisions of the regulatory program which address crew and supplyboats and tankers received extensive comments. Suggestions ranged fromregulating these sources while at or near an OCS facility (defined as 150feet by some commenters and as on the lease tract by others) to the regulationof these sources from the time they leave port to the time they returnto port. The DOI proposes to continue to regulate emissions from crew andsupply boats when they are attached to the OCS facility which they areservicing.The inclusion of crew and supply boats as part of the OCS facility whenthe boat is located at the OCS facility places the requirement for theinstallation of OCS RACT on these sources. The installation of OCS RACTon boats relates only to pieces of equipment or operational limitations,such as the use of fuel which contains reduced levels of sulfur compounds.OCS RACT does not refer or relate to emission reduction techniques suchas speed limits for the crew and supply boats in transit between theirports and the OCS facility. The OCS RACT determination for special, one-timeuse boats (for example, a special barge for the installation of a platformstructure) will be made on a case-by-case basis.Definition of OCS Best Available Control Technology (BACT) and OCS ReasonablyAvailable Control Technology (RACT)OCS BACT and OCS RACT are defined in the existing rules to parallel thedefinition used by the EPA: Control technology which considers the energy,environmental, and economic impacts in assessing the status of a candidateemission control technology as appropriate for a particular application.The proposed definition for OCS BACT differs from the definition of BACTin the existing rules and from that of the onshore California air pollutionagencies (which is similar to the Lowest Achievable Emission Rate definitionestablished by EPA) but tries to reflect the economic and safety considerationsthat are unique to OCS facilities. The definition includes several explicitfactors that are intended to be guides in determining, on a case-by-casebasis, whether a candidate emission control technology will be installed.The rule proposes that OCS BACT will be installed on all new OCS facilitysources and OCS RACT will be installed on all existing sources (includingexisting crew and supply boats) or applicable sources used for these newOCS facilities' operations. The installation of control equipment willreduce the quantity of emissions from these sources and reduce the onshoreimpacts from OCS facilities. ``Applicable sources'' for construction activitiesmeans sources that will be used on a more than one-time basis, such ascrew and supply boats. A source which will be used for one unique project,such as a special crane or barge, will be evaluated on a case-by-case basis.Requirements for the installation of BACT for new sources in the coastalCalifornia air districts vary. Some require the installation of BACT onall sources; others require the installation of BACT if emissions exceedlevels ranging as high as 250 tons per year. RACT can be required as theresult of the periodic SIP analyses and rulemaking for existing onshoresources.A Notice printed elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4> describes the process by which specific controltechnologies are determined to represent OCS BACT or OCS RACT and proposesan initial list of OCS BACT and OCS RACT for various OCS sources. Becausethe candidate emission control technologies apply to a wide range of differentsources used for the same purpose (such as power generators) and becauseemission control technologies are, in many cases, source specific (thereare unique technologies for lean-burn engines that differ from those forrich-burn engines), the installation of all the listed emission controltechnologies is not practical or appropriate. A provision is included toallow the lessee to justify why installation of an identified emissioncontrol technology would not be appropriate for a source.Definition of Emission OffsetsThe acquisition of emission offsets is an option if mitigation is requiredbecause a proposed OCS activity or OCS facility will emit pollutants inexcess of permitted levels. Emission offsets can be obtained from stationarysources, such as power plants (commonly referred to as ``traditional offsets'')and from mobile sources, such as cars and buses (commonly referred to as``nontraditional offsets''). The DOI received numerous comments concerning the appropriate definitionfor emission offsets. The commenters were concerned that the definitionwould reflect the onshore agencies' requirements (both EPA and the State/localrules) and that the OCS program be coordinated with the onshore programsto insure against the double-counting of offsets by both onshore and offshoreagencies.The DOI proposes a definition and regulatory provisions that reflect therequirements of the onshore agencies, include key aspects of the Federalrequirments, and insure proper coordination between the onshore and OCSprograms by mandating that the lessees obtaining offsets coordinate withthe appropriate onshore agencies. OCS operators proposing the use of onshoreemission offsets must show that the appropriate onshore agencies have beennotified and the appropriate SIP amended before the offset can be appliedto the OCS facility. The provisions for emission offsets are proposed toaddress the concerns of the commentors and to insure appropriate coordinationand accounting for any proposed emission offsets.The DOI is also considering the establishment of an offset ``banking''program. A <T4>Federal Register </T4>Notice published by EPA on December 4, 1986 (51FR 43813), outlined EPA's program, and aspects of it could serve as a basisfor DOI's program. This banking program would allow an operator to placein reserve (bank) for later use emission offsets that had been obtainedbut were not needed because the specific activity for which the offsetwas obtained was terminated or the mitigation requirement for the projectwas reduced (possibly by the reduced production level at the OCS facility).An explanation of the other paragraphs of the rule follows:Cumulative AssessmentsThe provisions of andSection; 250.47(a)(3) of the proposed rule describea periodic cumulative assessment of the impact of emissions from OCS facilitieson onshore air quality by the RD in coordination with the local air pollutioncontrol agencies. The local agencies will be able to petition the RD toimplement emission control measures for OCS facilities determined to havea beneficial effect on onshore air quality. The RD would assess and implementthose measures determined to be appropriate and feasible on OCS sources.Facilities Affecting Both Attainment and Nonattainment AreasThe provisions of andSection; 250.47(a)(4) of the proposed rule relate toOCS facilities that may affect both attainment and nonattainment areas.The intent of this provision is to set a distance from an onshore nonattainmentarea within which an OCS facility is treated as if it were affecting thatnonattainment area. This distance is proposed to be 25 miles. The JointInteragency Ozone Modeling Study (JIMS) for the Santa Barbara Channel Areapredicted that the ambient ozone impact from a group of sources fell below1 to 2 parts per billion 25 miles downwind of the sources. This impactlevel is considered the sensitivity level for the photochemical modelsused for these analyses. This distance is also extensively referenced inan EPA <T4>Federal Register </T4>Notice dated November 24, 1987 (52 FR 45043)outlining EPA's post-1987 ozone and carbon monoxide nonattainment areapolicy.MitigationSection 250.47(a)(5) of the proposed rule addresses the methods by whichmitigation for emissions from an OCS facility in excess of the allowablelevels may be obtained. The ANPR proposed options that could be employedif mitigation of emissions were required. They were:1. Traditional and nontraditional offsets (defined above),2. Interpollutant offsets (substituting the acquisition of an offset forone pollutant for the mitigation required for a second pollutant; an exampleis the acquisition of VOC offsets to satisfy a mitigation requirement forNO<T2>x</T2> emissions),3. Interbasin offsets (the acquisition of offsets in an onshore air basinadjacent to the onshore air basin directly impacted by the emissions froma source),4. A fee program (a program in which a fee is paid in lieu of the acquisitionof offsets; the pooled funds are directed to emission control strategiesor programs that are either too large, too costly, or involve too manysmall sources for one operator to fund),5. The application of advanced emission control technology (technologythat is unproven in the application being proposed but that has been shownin other applications to effectively reduce the emissions of a particularpollutant), and 6. The application of additional emission control equipment, technologythat is proven in the application being proposed but is not listed as arequired control by the OCS BACT requirement.The DOI would include traditional offsets, non-traditional offsets, andthe application of advanced emission control technology as options whenmitigation is required by the proposed rule. The DOI believes that additionalinformation concerning the rule of the precursors to ozone in its formationand the long-range transport of pollutants must be gathered before eitheran interpollutant or an interbasin offset program is developed and proposedbut will consider the use of interpollutant offsets on a case-by-case basiswhen analyses establish net equivalency to the RD and, when onshore offsetsources are proposed, the appropriate onshore agencies. The applicationof control equipment not listed as OCS BACT is not being proposed because,upon additional analysis, no technology or pieces of equipment were identifiedfor this category. When offsets are provided as a mitigation option, thetotal quantity of the emission offsets obtained must equal or exceed theprojected emissions profile for the OCS facility being mitigated, as specifiedby the proposed rule.California Air Quality Advisory Committee (CAQAC)Several commenters suggested the chartering of an advisory committee whena notice of final rulemaking (NFR) was developed. The committee would providethe RD with general advice and recommendations as well as review of theelements of the NFR. The DOI is proposing to charter an advisory committee.The proposed committee would provide advice and recommendations to theRD in the development of elements for the implementation of the rules includingOCS BACT and OCS RACT, risk assessments for toxic air pollutants, and elementsof the electrification analysis. There would be five voting members: Oneperson representing the State of California, one person representing thelocal counties/air pollution control agencies, one person representingthe offshore industry, one person representing the environmental community,and a chairman selected by the Secretary. Nonvoting, ex officio memberswould include representatives from MMS, EPA, and the U.S. Coast Guard.The CAQAC will meet at least once a year, and during the first few years,it will meet more than once a year. Actions receiving the unanimous consentof the voting members would be forwarded as recommendations of the committeeand actions not receiving unanimous consent would be forwarded with thediffering opinions.The CAQAC would be allowed to establish technical workgroups to developinformation for the committee's agenda items. These workgroups would consistof technically qualified staff or representatives from the groups representedon the committee.Emissions Monitoring RequirementsThe proposed rule includes in andSection; 250.47(a)(6) emissions monitoringrequirements that would be applicable to both new and existing facilities,including any that require emissions controls after modification. Theserequirements parallel those of existing andSection;andSection; 250.45 and 250.46.The proposed provisions require the lessee to submit emissions data monthly,including information determined by DOI to be necessary to insure compliancewith the remainder of the rules and in a form prescribed by DOI, and thatthe lessee prepare a plan to evaluate the effectiveness of the monitoringequipment employed and submit the results of that evaluation.Annual Projected InventoryUnder andSection; 250.47(a)(7) of the proposed rule, a lessee would be requiredto update annually the past and projected total emissions for the lessee'sOCS facilities within a given OCS air basin and submit the informationto the RD.Collection of Meteorological DataUnder andSection; 250.47(a)(8) of the proposed rule, a lessee may be requiredto collect and submit meteorological data in the same manner as requiredunder andSection;andSection; 250.45 and 250.46. The Quality Assurance Handbookfor Air Pollution Measurement Systems: Vol. IV Meteorological Measurements(EPA-600/4-82-060, Feb., 1983) and Onsite Meteorological Program Guidancefor Regulatory Modeling Application (EPA-450/4-87-013, June 1987) providesguidelines concerning the acquisition of data.Inspection of OCS Facilities and EnforcementGeneral provisions for the inspection of OCS facilities are addressed inandSection; 250.47(a)(9) of the proposed rule. This paragraph also includesrequirements for the source test program for an OCS facility. Where applicable,40 CFR Part 60, Appendix A, provides guidelines for the periodic sourcetest procedures.This paragraph also includes the granting of a short-term variance duringthose periods of upset conditions (periods of time when pieces of equipmentmalfunction) which may arise from time to time without penalty so longas the provisions of the paragraph are complied with. A variance couldbe granted to allow the continuation of operations with a schedule forthe repair of the malfunctioning piece of equipment. Any emissions occurringduring the upset condition must be reported.New OCS Facilities The provisions of andSection; 250.47(b) of the proposed rule pertain to ``newOCS facilities'' as defined at andSection; 250.47(a) and apply to all operationsoccurring in the OCS off the coast of California. Section andSection; 250.47(b)(2)of the proposed rule details the information to be included with a planthat will enable the RD to make the required determinations. The Electrification Analysis Under andSection; 250.47(b)(3) of the proposed rule, the preparation of anelectrification analysis is proposed for OCS development and productionfacilities. The existing rules do not require an analysis of the acquisitionof electricity for an OCS facility from onshore sources. Guidelines forthe economic component of the analysis are proposed in Appendix B of thisNotice. This analysis would provide information which would be used by the RD indetermining whether a facility should obtain its power from OCS sourcesor from onshore sources, such as cogeneration facilities or the onshorepower grid. If power for an OCS facility can be obtained from the onshorepower grid, the net emissions and onshore impacts from the OCS can be reduced.An OCS facility's electric power generation equipment is a principal sourceof OCS emissions; therefore, electrification defined in andSection; 250.47(a)(2))is considered as a means of reducing air emissions from OCS areas, wherefeasible. However, DOI is concerned that alternate power sources supplyingthe power needed for OCS projects may emit comparable levels of pollutionand have environmental impacts in the areas where the power is produced.A decision on the feasibility of electrifying an OCS facility from onshoresources could take into consideration the net environmental impact of theanalyzed scenarios. There is a minimal level of on-facility generated power needed to providepower to fire and safety equipment and for backup power in case the onshorepower source is disrupted (to insure the safety of the platform and personnel).The final decision concerning the electrification of an OCS facility willbe made by the RD. Section 250.47(b)(3) also proposes a process by which the RD will discussthe content of the electrification analysis with the CAQAC and considerthe individual committee member's comments in determining the extent towhich power for the proposed OCS facility will be met from onshore sources.The CAQAC will not provide any project-specific recommendations on theseanalyses. Initial Emission Control Requirement Section 250.47(b)(4) of the proposed rule requires the installation ofemission control technology on all appropriate sources associated withnew OCS projects. This level of emission control is defined as either OCSBACT for new sources, such as power generators on a new facility, and OCSRACT for existing sources, including crew and supply boats, associatedwith new facilities. The existing rules require the installation of emissioncontrol equipment only after an analysis is conducted that shows that anOCS facility would have a significant effect on onshore air quality. Theinstallation of control equipment will reduce the emissions and onshoreimpacts from OCS facilities and also provides energy efficiency benefitsfor the operators. An example is the use of waste heat from the power generationequipment as a way to meet the heat requirements for processing at thesame time the operator reduces power generation capacity and net emissions.A Noticed published elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register </T4>proposes a determination of emission controltechnologies on pieces of equipment that would constitute OCS BACT or OCSRACT. Once these lists are final, all new applicable OCS sources wouldbe required to install the listed emission control equipment unless theoperator could show the RD that a particular piece of equipment or strategyis inappropriate for the specific OCS facility. An example of this situationis where the list contains emission control equipment for ``lean-burn''diesel generators but an operator chooses to install a ``rich-burn'' dieselgenerator with the listed emission control equipment for ``rich-burn''diesel generators. The installation of emission controls for a ``lean-burn''diesel generator is inappropriate in this case.<T3>Air Quality Review and Additional Controls Required </T3>Section 250.47(b)(5) of the proposed rule proposes review and mitigationrequirements for exploration, construction, and development/production/processingphases of OCS projects for the photochemical and inert air pollutants.The existing rules, as discussed earlier, require a three-step processto determine if a significant onshore impact will result from emissionsfrom a new OCS facility and the degree of mitigation required if such animpact is predicted. The existing rules use an emission-based approachfor the ozone precursor VOC and an impact-based approach for the remainingpollutants. These approaches apply to all phases of an OCS project, withvarying degrees of mitigation required based on the phase being analyzed.These approaches apply to all phases of an OCS project to minimize thenet emissions and onshore impacts from an OCS project. The proposed rule differs from the existing rules in the approach employedfor the controlled pollutants, the scope of mitigation required for a particularphase of a project, and the stage during the review at which emission controlequipment is required. The emission levels at which control equipment andmitigation is required are also reduced in the proposed rule from the existingrules. Ozone Precursors_Exploration The proposed regulation for exploration operations limits the number ofexempt simultaneous drilling operations that can take place in an OCS airbasin off California and in all OCS air basins off California (see themap in Appendix A of this Notice), places spatial limitations on the proximityof operations to one another, and uses a performance standard for the emissionsof NO<T2>x</T2>_a precursor to ozone and NO<T2>2</T2>. These provisions will reduce the net emissions and onshoreimpacts from the exploration phase of OCS activities. The limitation on simultaneous operations is based on the designation ofthe OCS air basin with regard to onshore ozone status. The limitation iscoupled with a provision to provide lessees with relief under the suspensionprovisions of the 30 CFR Part 250 regulations when drilling activitiesare prevented. The proposed performance standard is based on the present and predictedcapabilities of engine manufacturers to develop engines with lower emissionlevels. Presently, some Caterpillar diesel engines can attain the 8 gramsper horsepower-hour standard. The engines of other manufacturers may beable to attain this standard in the near future and can attain the 11 gramsper horsepower-hour standard at the present time. A limited number of explorationdrilling vessels, under 20 percent of the total worldwide, are equippedwith the Caterpillar engines that can attain the lower standard. A majorityof the remaining exploration drilling vessels are equipped with enginesthat can be retrofitted to attain the higher standard or can attain thehigher standard at the present time. The lower standard appears to be awidely attainable performance standard by most manufacturers in the nearfuture. The limitation of exempt exploration operations occurring simultaneouslyrequires the full mitigation of emissions from operations in excess ofthe allowable number occurring in the same OCS air basin at the same time.If the allowable number of exploration operations is three, for example,emissions from a fourth and each additional exploration operation occurringat the same time would have to be fully mitigated using one of the optionsprescribed in andSection; 250.47(a)(5) of the proposed rule. The proposed rule allows either four, three, or two exempt explorationoperations to occur simultaneously depending on the ability of the vesselsto meet the performance standard proposed in this section. In a reviewof the historic records of exploration activities in the California OCS,the maximum number of separate operations that occurred in any <T3>1 year</T3> was 12 in 1983 and was split between the Santa Barbaraand Santa Maria Basins. Since that time, there have been less than sixoperations in any year in the two basins. Ozone Precursors_ConstructionThe proposed rule sets an emission allowance for construction activitiesbased on a calendar quarter basis. The proposed allowances are one-fourthof the applicable annual emission allowances for development/productionactivities in the OCS air basins adjacent to the onshore areas designatedas either attainment or nonattainment. The rule also proposes to limit the mitigation requirements for the ozoneprecursors from construction activities to the mitigation requirement forthe maximum annual emission level for each pollutant for the development/productionphase of the OCS facility. Ozone Precursors_Development/Production ActivitiesThe rule proposes in andSection; 250.47(b)(5)(iii) to govern both NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC emissions as photochemical pollutants. Both pollutantsparticipate in the formation of ozone in the atmosphere when other precursorcompounds are available in the presence of sunlight. The onshore Californiaagencies have developed their SIP's to include control of NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC. The DOI requests commenters to provide informationon the scientific basis for the control of both pollutants as photochemicalprecursors.The proposed rule requires the lessee to comply with an emission-basedreview for a new facility. The proposed approach differs from the existingrules in several respects: First, the existing rules only govern VOC asa precursor for ozone; second, the allowance emission levels are basedon the formula, E=33.3D (where E is the allowable emissions in tons peryear and D is the distance of the facility from shore) and provide forhigher allowable emission levels; and third, the existing rules requirea 1:1 offset ratio, even in nonattainment areas. The proposed rule proposes to regulate both VOC and NO<T2>x</T2> emissions, to set emission allowance at least as stringent (butin most cases, more stringent) than those allowed by the exemption formula,and to set an offset ratio at least as stingent (but in some cases, morestringent) than those in the existing rules.The proposed rule proposes an emission allowance of 100 tons per year forOCS facilities located adjacent to an onshore ozone attainment area and46 tons per year for OCS facilities located adjacent to or within 25 milesof an onshore ozone nonattainment area. The emission allowance values proposedfor development/production activities for the ozone precursors are basedon the CAA definition of a major stationary source and the California modelair quality rule and are supported by an analysis of various emission levelsfrom OCS facilities on onshore ozone concentrations. The following topic,Modeling Analyses Pertinent to the Proposed Rule, outlines this and a priormodeling analysis.  Several commenters suggested that DOI investigate the development of animpact-based regulatory program for the ozone precursors. Under such aprogram, onshore impact levels are used as standards to determine the control/mitigationrequirements for an OCS project.  The DOI has gathered a great deal of information on this subject and isproposing to require an emission-based approach for the ozone precursors,NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC, maintaining the regulatory structure of the existingrules. This proposal uses an emission-based approach due to the unansweredquestions related to impact-based regulation of NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC emissions at the present time. The DOI will continueto gather information on this subject and participate in scientific investigationsconcerning the formation and transport of ozone and its precursors, andDOI encourages further work by the scientific community on this subject. Modeling Analyses Pertinent to the Proposed Rule  Two studies that have been used in developing the proposed emission allowancesfor development and production activities and form the technical basisfor their inclusion are the Joint Interagency Modeling Study (JIMS) SantaBarbara Ozone Modeling Analysis and the Ozone Analyses for the CaliforniaRulemaking. The former analysis was conducted in 1984 and 1985 by SystemsApplication, Inc. (SAI), San Rafael, California, under the direction ofDOI, EPA, CARB, and the Counties of Santa Barbara and Ventura. The latteranalysis was conducted in 1987 and 1988 by SAI under the direction of DOI. Both analyses assessed the onshore ozone impact of various emission scenariosand source configurations for OCS development in the Santa Barbara andSanta Maria Basins. The JIMS analysis indicated that at the receptor sitesexceeding the NAAQS for ozone (120 parts per billion, ppb) during the meteorologicalscenario analyzed, the predicted contribution from the OCS facilities incorporatedinto the analyses was less than 1 ppb. At receptor sites were the maximumimpact from the OCS facilities was predicted (12 ppb), the predicted ozoneconcentrations were less than the NAAQS for ozone.  The 1987-1988 study assessed the onshore ozone impacts from various emissionscenarios while maintaining the source configurations for the OCS facilitiespresently located in the Santa Barbara Channel. This analysis indicatedthat single OCS facilities emitting 100 or 50 tons of each ozone precursorwere predicted to have onshore impacts of less than 1 ppb, and under mostof the emission scenarios assessed, the cumulative impact from all theOCS facilities was predicted to be less than 5 ppb.  As indicated in the preceding discussion, the recent analysis used informationdeveloped during the former analysis and the report of its assessment ispart of the administrative record for this rulemaking. The DOI has alsoconsidered modeling studies prepared for lease sales, exploration plans,and development and production plans in the Pacific OCS Region. These documentsare publicly available, and commenters may contact the RD to review copiesof these assessments.  Inert Pollutants_Exploration, Construction, Development and ProductionActivities  The proposed rule addresses inert pollutants in andSection;250.47(b)(5)(iv)(A).The proposed provisions provide for the use of a refined analysis (computermodeling and the comparison with the significance levels) to determineif mitigation of emissions is required. The significance levels (also referredto as de minimis levels) for attainment and nonattainment areas in andSection;andSection;250.45and 250.46 are retained and the mitigation requirements of those sectionsare strengthened: mitigation to the significance levels for OCS facilitiesin OCS air basins adjacent to onshore attainment areas and mitigation tozero net emissions for OCS facilities in OCS air basins adjacent to onshorenonattainment areas.  The present onshore air quality programs require mitigation of residualemissions after the installation of emission control technology at levelsranging from 18 to 250 tons per year depending on the pollutant and theattainment status of the onshore area. Two examples of impact-based significancelevels used in onshore regulatory programs are the Emission Offset InterpretiveRuling (40 CFR Part 51, Appendix S) developed by EPA (these are the basisfor the significance levels incorporated into the existing DOI air qualityrules) and the PSD program.  The DOI also proposes to include regulation of lead emissions as an inertpollutant. Several commenters have suggested that since the emissions oflead from OCS facilities are very small, DOI should make a generic findingof no significant potential impact on onshore concentrations for it andwithdraw the requirement for an analysis of lead emissions on a project-by-projectbasis. Commenters are requested to provide information on the emissionof lead and the identified toxic pollutants from OCS facilities.  The CAA established NAAQS and PSD increments for particulate matter usingTSP as the indicator. This indicator includes both large and small particles.Recent scientific work indicates that those particles with an aerodynamicdiameter equal to or less than a nominal 10 micrometers, classified asPM<T2>10</T2>, are of greater concern to health because these particles canbe readily inhaled into the respiratory system.Based on extensive data, EPA published a final rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on July 1, 1987 (52 FR 24633), changing the indicatorfor particulate matter from TSP to PM<T2>10</T2> except in the PSD program, which retains TSP as the particulatematter indicator, pending further work by EPA. Following EPA guidance,DOI proposes to change the particulate matter indicator to PM<T2>10</T2> for this rule except in the PSD provisions.ModelingSection 250.47(b)(5)(iv) of the proposed rule requires the use of an airquality computer model and modeling protocols approved by the Director,MMS, for projected emissions of inert pollutants for all OCS facilities.In a <T4>Federal Register</T4> Notice published on March 28, 1985 (50 FR 12248),DOI announced its approval of the Offshore and Coastal Dispersion (OCD)model for all analyses for inert pollutants required by the OCS air qualityrules.Inert Pollutants_Prevention of Significant Deterioration ProvisionsThe provisions of the proposed rule for PSD in attainment areas are addressedin andSection; 250.47(b)(5)(iv)(B). The DOI received limited comments onthe PSD provisions. A suggestion was made to expand the protection affordedClass 1 PSD areas to include protection of the Class 1 area air quality-relatedvalues. The DOI believes that the inclusion of such a provision should be consideredin a separate rulemaking which would cover all OCS areas, not just a ruleto cover the California OCS areas. As DOI undergoes its review of the existingrules for the other OCS areas, this protection provision will be considered.The DOI proposes only one change to the PSD provisions: A clarificationis added to insure that the consumed portion of the available PSD incrementis the total of the offshore and onshore sources. The provisions of theexisting DOI rules may have implied that both the offshore and onshoresources were each entitled to consume a separate total PSD increment. The EPA has also been required to establish PSD increments for the otherair pollutants for which a primary or secondary NAAQS has been established.Once these additional PSD increments are established, DOI will incorporatethe increments into the provisions of the rule through a rulemaking process.Toxic Air Pollutants The DOI proposes in andSection; 250.47(b)(6) of the proposed rule to regulatefive pollutants designated as toxic and require risk assessments for thesepollutants if the RD determines that such an assessment is required. Theexisting rules do not address the emissions of toxic air pollutants fromOCS sources. Though the emissions of these pollutants are small, theseprovisions will insure that the onshore impacts from these emissions arebelow levels at which health effect might occur. Several commenters have suggested that since the emissions of the pollutantsregulated by this provision are very small, DOI should make a generic findingof no significant potential impact on onshore concentrations of these pollutantsand withdraw the requirement of an analysis on a project-by-project basis.Commenters are requested to provide information on the emission levelsof the pollutants regulated under this paragraph and related informationthat will assist DOI in preparing the risk assessment for the generic finding.Existing OCS FacilitiesSection 250.47(c) of the proposed rule proposes to require the installationof emission control technology defined as OCS RACT within 3 years of theeffective date of the rule on all OCS facilities defined as existing bythe rule and located adjacent to or within 25 miles of an onshore nonattainmentarea, except existing OCS Offshore Storage and Treatment (OSandamp;T) facilities.Existing OCS facilities located adjacent to an onshore attainment areawould have to install OCS RACT only if required by the periodic cumulativeassessment proposed in andSection; 250.47(a)(3).OCS RACT is a less stringent set of control equipment than OCS BACT inthat OCS RACT considers economics to a greater extent in determining ifa candidate emissions control technology is appropriate than does OCS BACT.A <T4>Federal Register</T4> Notice published elsewhere in this issue proposesemission control technologies or pieces of equipment that constitute OCSRACT. Emission reductions realized by the installation of OCS RACT early in the3-year period cannot be used for mitigation requirements. Commenters arerequested to provide comments on the nature of those requirements for existingOCS facilities.Modifications to Facilities The DOI is proposing provisions to regulate modifications to existing OCSfacilities in andSection; 250.47(d) of the proposed rule. An emission allowanceof 10 tons per year for all pollutants, except CO which is 250 tons peryear, is proposed above which net emission increases from modificationsshall be mitigated. The only exception to these provisions is an OCS facilitywhose initial emissions before the modifications was below the emissionallowance established in the provisions for new OCS facilities. Two aspects of this paragraph's provisions applicable to new OCS facilitieswith initial projected peak annual emissions below the levels in Table2 in proposed rule B need to be amplified. If the applicable level in Table2 is 46 tons per year, the modified OCS facility's initial peak emissionswere 45 tons per year, and the modification will add 1.5 tons per yearto the peak emission level. The mitigation requirement for the OCS facilityis 46.5 tons per year for the future life of the OCS facility. Under thisscenario, the OCS facility is: (a) Not given an allowance of 10 tons peryear for a total of 56 tons per year before mitigation is required and(b) the mitigation applies prospectively, into the future, and not retrospectively,from the initial installation of the OCS facility. The proposed emission allowance for modifications is based on the quantityof emissions that occur based upon certain changes to equipment that aretypically made to OCS facilities. Emissions resulting from the routinemaintenance, repair, or replacement of pollutant sources on an OCS facilityare less than 5 tons. Emissions resulting from the installation of new,minor pieces of equipment, such as a standby diesel generator, are slightlymore than 10 tons. Emissions resulting from the installation of new, majorpieces of equipment, such as a generator set or a compressor, are slightlymore than 25 tons.Questions for Commenters Though comments are requested on all aspects of the proposed rule, DOIrequests that readers also address the following questions and providespecific recommendations, suggestions, or technical information to supporttheir comments: 1. All California coastal counties are requested to submit their respectiveupdated attainment status and the current technical justification for thatstatus. 2. Should facilities affecting attainment areas be required to obtain emissionoffsets and mitigation emissions above an allowable level? 3. Definitions. Should other terms be included? Should alternate definitionsbe used for terms presently included? 4. Required information. What is the appropriate amount of informationthat should be collected? 5. Electrification cost analysis. Is the protocol document sufficientlyclear and complete to guide the development and performance of the analysis?6. OCS BACT and RACT. Should OCS BACT or OCS ACT be installed on applicablesources associated with new OCS facilities regardless of their distancefrom shore, their size, or their onshore impact? 7. Cumulative Assessments. Should the cumulative assessments performedbased on the provisions of andSection; 250.47(a)(3) be used instead of approachesdescribed in andSection; 250.47(b)(5) (i)-(iv) to insure compliance withthe intent of the OCS Lands Act?8. Banking rules. Comments are invited on provisions for the banking ofemission offsets obtained in excess of those required by the provisionsof the proposed rule.9. What incentives can be incorporated to the proposed rule that will encouragethe demonstration of advanced control technologies on OCS facilities?10. Toxic Pollutants and Lead. The emissions of lead and the toxic airpollutants from OCS facilities are very low (see EIR for the ARCO CoalOil Point Development Project). Should a separate assessment be requiredfor each new OCS project, or should DOI make a generic finding of no impactand provide this finding along with the technical justification in thefinal rulemaking? What are the emissions of the identified toxic pollutantsand lead from OCS sources?11. What is the economic impact of the provisions of the proposed ruleon present and future OCS activities?12. Comments on the environmental and economic impact and desirabilityof exempting temporary emission sources, operating during periods of timewhen no historic exceedances of the NAAQS were recorded, from the controlrequirements of the proposed rule.13. Please provide any other comments, suggestions, or recommendationsyou may have relative to emissions controls and requirements on OCS facilitiesoff the coast of California without regard to whether the specific issuesinvolved were mentioned in this Notice.The results of a Determination of the Effect of the Rule (DOER) preparedby DOI for this Notice concluded that the rule as proposed will not resultin increased costs sufficient to designate the rule as ``major,'' accordingto OMB guidelines. Please provide information that will assist in the evaluationof this analysis.The DOI has determined that this action does not constitute a major Federalaction affecting the quality of the human environment; therefore, an environmentalimpact statement is not required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291</ITAG>The DOI has also determined that the proposed rule is not a major ruleunder Executive Order 12291 because the annual economic effect is lessthan $100 million. The overall effect is expected to be approximately $10.5million per year. Please provide information that will assist in the evaluationof this analysis.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG>The DOI also certifies that the proposed rule will not have significanteffects on a substantial number of small entities under the RegulatoryFlexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), as the entities that engage in offshore activities arenot considered small due to the technical complexity and financial resourcesnecessary to conduct OCS minerals related activities.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in the proposed ruleshave been submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for approvalunder 44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq. The collection of this information will notbe required until it has been approved by OMB. Public reporting burdenof this collection of information is estimated to average 29.6 hours perresponse, including the time for reviewing instructions, searching existingdata sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completingand reviewing the collection of information. Send comments regarding thisburden estimate or any other aspect of this collection of information,including suggestions for reducing the burden, to the Information CollectionClearance Officer; Minerals Management Service; Mail Stop 631; 12203 SunriseValley Drive; Reston, Virginia 22091 and to the Office of Information andRegulatory Affairs; Office of Management and Budget; Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Authors</ITAG>Mitchell Baer, Branch of Environmental Operations, Offshore EnvironmentalAssessment Division, Minerals Management Service; L. Poe Leggette and SusanK. Hoven, Office of the Solicitor, Department of the Interior.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 30 CFR Part 250</ITAG>Continental shelf, Environmental impact statements, Environmental protection,Government contracts, Incorporation by reference, Investigations, Mineralroyalties, Oil and gas development and production, Oil and gas exploration,Oil and gas reserves, Penalties, Pipelines, Public lands/mineral resources,Public lands-right-of-way, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Sulphurdevelopment and production, Sulphur exploration, Surety bonds.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: December 22, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Robert E. Kallman, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director, Minerals Management Service.</ITAG>For the reasons set forth in the preamble, 30 CFR Part 250 is proposedto be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 250_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 250 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 204, Pub. L. 95-372, 92 Stat. 629 (43 U.S.C. 1334).</ITAG>2. A new andSection; 250.47 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 250.47</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Facilities on the OCS adjacent to California.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>No air pollutant emitted from an OCS facility shall causeor contribute to a concentration greater than is permitted under the nationalsecondary ambient air quality standards, or the concentration permittedunder the national primary ambient air quality standards, whichever concentrationis lowest for the air pollutant for the period of exposure. The primaryand secondary national ambient air quality standards (NAAQS) are describedat 40 CFR Part 50. No emission from an OCS facility shall cause or contributeto an onshore concentration of an air pollutant in excess of any Federallyestablished increment for the prevention of significant deterioration ofair quality. Emissions which comply with sections (a) through (d) are deemednot to cause or contribute to a concentration greater than is permittedunder a national primary or secondary standard or a PSD increment.(1) Applicability. The provisions of this section are the exclusive requirementsfor emissions of air pollutants from OCS facilities off the coast of California.(2) Definitions. For purposes of andSection; 250.47 of this part:``Actual emissions'' means the actual annual rate of emissions of a pollutantbased on the most recent 3-year period or a different period that is morerepresentative of a normal source operation for an OCS facility.``Adjacent onshore air basin'' means an onshore air basin that directlyborders a California OCS air basin.``Adjacent to'' means adjoining or next to.``Advanced control technology'' means emissions control technology whichis not recognized as OCS Best Available Control Technology (BACT) or OCSReasonably Available Control Technology (RACT) but which:(i) Will likely result in lower emissions than with the use of currentOCS BACT for the same offshore source,(ii) Is unproven for offshore applications,(iii) Can be used on OCS facilities, and (iv) Will not cause or contribute to an unreasonable risk to the human,marine or coastal environments, or to the actual facility in its operation,function, or malfunction.``Air pollutant'' means any airborne agent or combination of agents forwhich the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) has established, pursuantto section 109 of the Clean Air Act (CAA), national primary and secondaryambient air quality standards.``Attainment area'' means, for any air pollutant, an area which is shownby monitored data or which is calculated by air quality modeling (or othermethods determined by the Administrator of EPA to be reliable) not to exceedany NAAQS, established by EPA in 40 CFR Part 50, for such pollutant. TheRegional Director (RD) shall follow the area designations contained in40 CFR Part 81, Subpart C, pursuant to section 107(d)(1) of the CAA.``California Air Quality Advisory Committee (CAQAC)'' means the advisorycommittee established to provide advice and recommendations to the RD inthe development of elements for and the implementation of this rule. Thefunction of this committee is solely advisory. The CAQAC will make formalrecommendations to the RD on the BACT/RACT protocols and lists, the criteriafor risk assessment for toxic air pollutants and such other matters asthe RD deems appropriate. Recommendations will not be provided on a project-specificbasis. Participation on the CAQAC by designated representatives does notdiminish the right of individual members to provide comments on project-specificaspects of these rules during public commenting periods.``California OCS air basin'' or ``OCS air basin'' means one of the sevenOCS areas depicted in Appendix A of this Notice.``Construction'' means the process of installing an OCS facility, includingits underwater support and above-water structures and equipment, and associatedpipelines.``Electrification'' means the use of electric power generated onshore asthe primary source of power for an OCS development and production facility.``Emission offset'' means an emission reduction obtained from facilitiesor emission sources, either onshore or offshore, other than the facilityor facilities covered by the subject Exploration Plan or Development andProduction Plan. Offsets shall only include emission reductions which:(i) Are not required by applicable laws, rules, regulations, permits, ororders of any coastal air pollution control district (APCD) of the Stateof California, the California Air Resources Board (CARB), EPA, or the Departmentof the Interior (DOI) for the areas where each agency has jurisdiction;(ii) Are in excess of reductions relied upon by EPA in approving a StateImplementation Plan (SIP) to demonstrate or make progress toward attainmentof an NAAQS or PSD increment or by the relevant permitting authority inissuing any construction or operating permit under a permitting programapproved as part of the applicable SIP;(iii) Will occur during the activity for which they are obtained;(iv) Can be characterized and estimated; and(v) Are real and enforceable by emission limitations or permit conditions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For each calendar year, offsets provided for an OCS facility mustmatch the emissions for the facility requiring mitigation based on theemissions profile for the facility. The provisions of regulations publishedat 40 CFR 51.165(a)(3)(i) (A) and (B) and (ii) (A), (C), (E), and (G) and40 CFR 51, App. S (1987) and the Emissions Trading Policy Statement, SectionII A and B (51 FR 43831-43834, December 4, 1986) shall apply to the acquisitionof onshore emission offsets.``Emissions profile'' is the permitted profile of projected annual emissionsfor a facility over the lifetime of that facility. In the event that emissionsfrom a facility are changed over time through the implementation of controltechnologies or changes in the anticipated operating characteristics forthe facility, are approved by MMS, and are incorporated into a modifiedapproved plan for the OCS facility, the emissions profile will be correctedfor the subsequent years to account for these changes. Mitigation requirementsbased on the emissions profile will reflect similar corrections.``Exceedance'' means a monitored measurement or modeled prediction greaterthan the NAAQS or PSD increment for the particular pollutant. ``Existing facility'' is a facility described in an Exploration Plan ora Development and Production Plan deemed submitted under andSection; 250.33(b)(19)or 250.34(b)(12), as appropriate, before the effective date of this rule.``Exploration drilling operation'' means an activity associated with anapproved Exploration Plan for the period of time between the movement ofa mobile drilling vessel to one surface location (defined by a discretelatitude and longitude) on the OCS and the movement of the vessel awayfrom the location. ``Facility'' means any installation or device permanently or temporarilyattached to the seabed in the OCS which is used for exploration, construction,development, production or processing activities and which emits or hasthe potential to emit any air pollutant from one or more sources. All offshoreequipment directly associated with the installation or device shall beconsidered part of a single facility if the equipment is dependent on,or affects the processes of, the installation or device. Crew and supplyboats used to supply or transport personnel and materials to an OCS facilityshall be considered part of the facility while at the facility. (i) For development, production, and processing activities, multiple installationsor devices will be considered to be a single facility if the installationsor devices are directly related to the production of oil or gas at a singlesite. Tankers used to transport production from an OCS facility shall beconsidered part of the facility while physically attached to the facility.(ii) For exploration activities, each drilling vessel engaged in such activityis considered a single facility. (iii) For construction activities, the aggregate of equipment or devices(including barges, cranes, and crew and supply boats) at the site of thenew facility used to install or construct a development, production, orprocessing facility is a single facility. ``Group 1 PM<T2>10</T2> Planning Area'' means an area designated by the Administrator,EPA, using monitored data or determined by the Administrator, EPA, to havea probability greater than or equal to 95 percent of exceeding the PM<T2>10</T2> NAAQS. ``Group 2 PM<T2>10</T2> Planning Area'' means an area designated by the Administrator,EPA, using monitored data or determined by the Administrator, EPA, to havea probability between 20 and 95 percent of exceeding the PM<T2>10</T2> NAAQS. ``Group 3 PM<T2>10</T2> Planning Area'' means an area designated by the Administrator,EPA, using monitored data or determined by the Administrator, EPA, to havea probability less than 20 percent of exceeding the PM<T2>10</T2> NAAQS. ``Inert pollutant'' means any airborne agent which is directly emittedinto the atmosphere for which the EPA has established, pursuant to section109 of the CAA, national primary or secondary ambient air quality standards.For purposes of this rule, NO<T2>x</T2> will be regulated both as an inert and as a reactive pollutant.``Modified facility'' means a development, production, or processing facilitythat will undergo any physical change, change of operation, or the additionof a new source which could cause a cumulative net increase in emissionsof any air pollutant, beyond that specified in the approved Developmentand Production Plan. A physical change or change of operation does notinclude: (i) Routine maintenance, repair, and replacement of a piece of equipmentwith similar equipment which does not result in an increase in emissions;or (ii) An increase in the production rate unless such a change would be inexcess of the production rate approved under the appropriate Federal planor permit; or (iii) Any change in ownership at an OCS source or facility; or(iv) Actions included within the scope of operations of an approved planor permit. ``National Ambient Air Quality Standard (NAAQS)'' means the concentrationpermitted under the national secondary ambient air quality standard orthe concentration permitted under the national primary ambient air qualitystandard whichever concentration is lowest for the air pollutant for theperiod of exposure. The primary and secondary NAAQS are described at 40CFR Part 50. ``Net increase'' means an increase in emissions above the permitted emissionsprofile. ``New facility'' is a facility described in an Exploration Plan or a Developmentand Production Plan deemed submitted under andSection;andSection;250.33 or250.34 of this title, as appropriate, on or after the effective date ofthis rule. ``Nonattainment area'' means, for any air pollutant, an area which is shownby monitored data or which is calculated by air quality modeling (or othermethods determined by the Administrator, EPA, to be reliable) to exceedany NAAQS established by EPA in 40 CFR Part 50 for such air pollutant.Such term includes any area identified in 40 CFR Part 81, pursuant to section107 of the CAA and any area for which EPA has issued a notice of SIP deficiencypursuant to section 110(a)(2)(H) of the CAA. ``OCS best available control technology (BACT)'' means an emission controldevice, technique (such as the injection of water), or limitation (limitationson the sulfur content in fuels are included, but operational limitations,such as restricted throughputs and hours of operations are not included)for newly constructed OCS facilities based on the maximum degree of reductionfor each air pollutant subject to regulation which the Director, MMS, determinesis achievable for a particular application, taking into account its availability,safety, reliability, economic, and other environmental factors and effects,legality, and energy considerations. A technology shall be considered availableif it can be successfully transferred to the OCS application, has beensuccessfully used in its application for at least 1 year, and has been:(i) Used in an OCS application for at least 1 year; or (ii) Used in a similar nearshore or onshore application; or (iii) Used in an application on a different source. ``OCS reasonably available control technology (RACT)'' means an emissioncontrol device, system, process modification, strategy, or other apparatusor technique that can be reasonably required on an existing OCS source(such as a crew boat) or facility considering: (i) The necessity of imposing such emission limitations in order to attainand maintain an NAAQS or PSD increment, (ii) The social and economic impact of such emission limitations, (iii) Alternative means of providing for attainment and maintenance ofan NAAQS or PSD increment, and (iv) The availability, safety, reliability, economic and other environmentalfactors and effects, legality, and energy considerations of the use ofthe technology taking into account the useful remaining life of the sourceor facility. ``Onshore area'' means an area of California landward of the coastline.``Periodic'' means a period of time not less than 1 year and not more than5 years. ``Permitted emissions'' means the emissions in the approved ExplorationPlan or Development and Production Plan. ``PM<T2>10</T2>'' means particulate matter that includes those particles whichan aerodynamic diameter equal to or less than a nominal 10 micrometers(40 CFR Part 50). For purposes of this rule, only primary PM<T2>10</T2> emissions shall be used in complying with the applicable standardsin this section, until such time that EPA promulgates a method for thequantification/prediction of secondary PM<T2>10</T2> emissions. ``Prevention of significant deterioration (PSD) increment'' means an allowableincrease in ambient air pollutant concentrations as established by section163 of the CAA or by EPA, pursuant to section 166 of the CAA.``Projected emissions'' means expected permitted emissions from an OCSsource or sources taking into account Federally enforceable controls, measures,or devices which the applicant has proposed or installed.``Reactive pollutant'' means any airborne agent which is a precursor ofa pollutant for which the EPA has established, pursuant to section 109of the CAA, national primary and secondary ambient air quality standards.For purposes of this rule, NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC will be treated as precursors to ozone.``State implementation plan (SIP)'' means the plan or the portion of theplan approved by the EPA, pursuant to the CAA.``Source'' means an individual emission point. Several sources may be includedwithin a single facility.``Toxic air pollutant'' means an airborne agent regulated under this ruleand includes benzene, formaldehyde, chromium, nickel, and polycyclic aromatichydrocarbons (PAH).``Unclassifiable area'' means those air quality control regions, or portionsthereof, established in 40 CFR Part 81, Subpart C, pursuant to section107 of the CAA which cannot be classified under section 107 on the basisof available data.``Volatile organic compound (VOC)'' means, in general, any organic compoundwhich participates in tropospheric reactions and contributes to the formationof ozone. For the purposes of this rule, the term includes any organiccompound other than those which the Director, MMS, designates, consistentwith EPA designations, as having negligible photochemical reactivity. TheDirector, MMS, has designated all of the pollutants listed on page 4 ofthe ``Glossary for Air Pollution Control of Industrial Coating Operations''(EPA-450/3-83-013R) as negligibly reactive.(3) Cumulative assessments. The RD will provide emission inventory informationfor existing, approved, proposed, and potential OCS sources to local onshoreagencies conducting cumulative air quality analyses. The RD will participatewith the local agencies in the planning and analysis process includingthe identification and evaluation of potential control measures to reduceonshore and offshore emissions. The onshore agencies may petition the RDto consider the adoption and implementation of identified OCS emissioncontrol measures. The RD will take appropriate steps, taking into considerationthe advice of the CAQAC and which do not require rulemaking to implement(for example, the installation of RACT), the OCS emission control measuresthat are feasible and appropriate to improve onshore air quality. Emissioncontrol measures required through this process shall not include additionalemission offsets.(4) Facilities affecting more than one onshore area. (i) Reactive pollutants.A facility will be regulated according to the requirements governing emissionsin the OCS air basin (Appendix A) in which it is located unless it is within25 miles of an onshore nonattainment area, in which case the facility shallcomply with the regulatory requirements for facilities located in an OCSair basin adjacent to an onshore nonattainment area.(ii) Inert pollutants. If projected emissions from a facility affect theonshore air quality of both a nonattainment area and an attainment or unclassifiablearea, with an impact above the de minimis levels (paragraph (b)(5)(iv)(A))of this section, the regulatory requirements applicable to OCS facilitiesin an OCS air basin adjacent to an onshore nonattainment area shall apply.(5) Mitigation. (i) If mitigation is required to comply with the provisionsof this section, the lessee shall use a combination of the following options:(A) Traditional, nontraditional, and interpollutant (when net equivalencyis demonstrated to the RD and the appropriate onshore agencies) emissionoffsets.(B) Application of advanced emission control technology with the approvalof the RD. If the technology fails to achieve the required emission reductionswithin 4 years from start-up of production, the necessary emission reductionsmust be secured within 1 year thereafter by emission offsets option, andthe lessee shall be given partial credit for the funds expended to install,operate, and maintain the advanced emission control technology.(ii) When emission offsets are to be obtained, the lessee must demonstratethat:(A) The offsets are equivalent in nature and quantity to the projectedemissions that must be reduced;(B) A binding commitment exists between the lessee and the owner of thesource or sources; and(C) The appropriate air quality control jurisdiction has been notifiedof the need to revise the SIP to include the information regarding theoffsets.(iii) When emission offsets are obtained, the mitigation requirement fora facility is defined by the emissions profile for that facility. If emissionsfrom a facility are enforceably reduced over a period of time, the emissionsprofile and the mitigation requirements for the facility may be modified,in a manner approved by the RD.(6) Emission monitoring requirements. The lessee shall monitor in a formand manner approved or prescribed by the Director, MMS, actual emissionsfrom the facility. The lessee shall submit this information monthly ina manner approved or prescribed by the Director. All emission monitoringequipment shall comply with the performance specifications detailed in40 CFR Part 60, Appendix B. (7) Projected inventory. The lessee shall submit a projected inventoryof emissions of all air pollutants for its facilities in a manner and formapproved or prescribed by the RD. This inventory shall be updated annuallyon a time schedule established or approved by the RD, shall incorporatethe results of the most recent source test results, and will be made availableto the State and local air pollution control agencies. (8) Collection to meteorological data. The Director, MMS, may require thelessee to collect, for a period of time, and to submit, in a form and mannerapproved or prescribed by the Director, meteorological data from a facility.(9) Inspection of facilities and enforcement. (i) Source test program.Lessees shall be required to submit a source test program covering eachfacility emissions source including, but not limited to, turbines, heaters,pump engines, standby generators, and crane engines to verify actual emissionlevels. The plan shall include a detailed description of the source testprogram as well as follow-up tests to be performed no less frequently thanonce a year. The RD shall review the plan to determine whether it is appropriatefor determining compliance with the applicable air quality requirementsof this section for the facility. The lessee shall submit the results ofthe tests conducted in accordance with the approved plan on a periodicbasis, as approved or prescribed by the RD, and appropriate to the sourcetest program. (ii) Inspection and maintenance plan. Lessees shall submit an inspectionand maintenance plan to minimize emissions of fugitive hydrocarbons froma development and production facility's components. The RD shall reviewthe plan to determine whether it is appropriate for determining compliancewith the applicable emission control requirements of this section. Thelessee shall submit the results of the maintenance inspections conductedin accordance with the approved plan on a periodic basis, as approved orprescribed by the RD. (iii) Upset conditions. If any piece of equipment with the potential toemit air pollutants or any piece of air pollution control equipment requiredby this section fails to operate properly, the lessee shall notify theRD within 48 hours of the initial malfunction. The notification shall includethe following elements: Time of initial equipment malfunction, equipmentinvolved, location of equipment, cause or probable cause, time needed tocorrect the malfunction, assessment of risk to life, property, public health,or the environment from continued operations or shutdown of the equipment,and steps that are being taken to correct the malfunction and to precludereoccurrence. Malfunctioning equipment does not include equipment suchas valves and flanges from which fugitive emissions are emitted. Fugitiveemissions are covered by (a)(9)(ii) of this section. (A) If the piece of equipment is malfunctioning, it shall be shut downwithin 96 hours of the time that it first started to malfunction unlessthe malfunction is corrected within that period of time or unless the RDhas authorized continued operation of the malfunctioning equipment. (B) When an equipment malfunction requires more than 48 hours to correct,the RD may authorize continued operation of the equipment contigent uponthe lessee attaining an approved or prescribed schedule of increments ofprogress towards the correction of the malfunction. The lessee shall complywith the schedule for making progress toward correction of the malfunctionand shall use good engineering and management practices to reduce emissionsas expeditiously as practicable during the period of continued operation.The conditions for authorizing continued operation of the malfunctioningequipment shall provide for final compliance with the governing emissionlimitations as expeditiously as practicable, taking into considerationthe time needed to order, obtain, and install equipment and make repairs,the quantity and impact of the emissions resulting from the operation ofthe malfunctioning equipment, and the risk to life, property, the environment,and public health from continued operation or shutdown of the equipment.(C) Any emissions occurring during upset conditions shall be included inany emissions inventory or reports for the facility but not be the basisfor mitigation requirements. (b) <T3>Facilities described in a new Exploration Plan or Development and ProductionPlan. </T3>(1) Applicability of requirements. The requirements of thissection will be applicable to facilities described in a new ExplorationPlan or a new Development and Production Plan for OCS oil and gas leasesadjacent to California. (2) Required information. All Exploration Plans and Development and ProductionPlans (including the construction of facilities) for an OCS oil and gaslease adjacent to California shall include the following information: (i) For onshore activities directly associated with a proposed OCS facility,the lessee shall provide information on each source of air pollutant listingthe chemical composition and quantity of any regulated air pollutant andthe frequency and duration of emissions. (ii) For each facility in the OCS, the lessee shall submit the informationnecessary to make the findings required under paragraphs (b) (3) through(6) of this section. (A) (<T3>1</T3>) Projected emissions from each proposed or modified facilityfor each year of operation, and the bases for all calculations, to include:(<T3>i</T3>) For each source: The source, the amount of the emission byair pollutant expressed in tons per year (and other relevant units), thefrequency and duration of emission, and the stack parameters, includingtemperatures, flow rates and velocity, and stack dimensions; (<T3>ii</T3>) For each facility: The facility designation, the total amountof emissions per year by air pollutant expressed in tons and, in addition,for a modified facility only, the incremental amount of total emissionsby air pollutant resulting from the new or modified source or sources.If a mobile drilling vessel has been described in an earlier environmentalreport and the vessel has not been modified, the lessee may reference paragraphs(b)(2)(ii)(A)(<T3>1</T3>) (<T3>iii</T3>), (<T3>iv</T3>), and (<T3>v</T3>). (<T3>iii</T3>) A detailed description of all processes, process equipment,and storage units including information on fuels to be burned; (<T3>iv</T3>) A schematic drawing which identifies the location and elevationof each source; and (<T3>v</T3>) If projected emissions are based on the use of emission controltechnology, a description of the controls providing the information requiredby paragraph (b)(2)(ii)(E) of this section.(<T3>2</T3>) The distance of each proposed facility from the shoreline.(B) For sources and facilities being reviewed for the PSD provisions ofthis rule:(<T3>1</T3>) The model or models used to determine the effect of emissionsfrom each facility, or from other facilities when required by the Director,MMS, on the onshore air quality and the results obtained through the useof the model or models. (<T3>2</T3>) The best available meteorological information and data consistentwith the model or models used stating the basis for the information anddata selected. (C) The air quality status of the onshore air basin which is adjacent tothe OCS air basin in which the facility is located and the air qualitystatus of any other onshore air basin, any portion of which is locatedwithin 25 miles of the facility. An onshore air basin should be describedin terms of its EPA status i.e., nonattainment, attainment, or Unclassifiable,including the status of the onshore air basin by air pollutant; the existingor representative monitored air quality data as it exists; and the airpollution control agency whose jurisdiction covers the onshore air basin.(D) The PSD classification of the onshore air basin which is adjacent tothe OCS air basin in which the facility is located. (E)(<T3>1</T3>) The emission reduction control technology available to reduceemissions to include: the source, the emission control technology, thereductions achieved, and the monitoring system the lessee proposes to useto measure emissions. If applicable, the lessee shall indicate which emissionreduction control technology the lessee believes constitutes OCS BACT andthe basis for that opinion. (<T3>2</T3>) Prior to the approval of an Exploration Plan or a Developmentand Production Plan, the lessee must provide information on the ownershipof any offshore and onshore source or sources to be used for offsets forthe facility and the emission reduction obtainable from each source. (3) Electrification Analysis. (i) An electrification analysis, with thecost component conforming with the requirements set out in Appendix B ofthis section, shall be prepared for each new proposed development/production/processingfacility. (ii) The electrification analysis shall take into account the followingfactors: Net effect of electrification on air quality, energy considerations,costs, other environmental effects, and overall emissions. Other considerationswill be: location, availability, and reliability of the source of electricity;technical feasibility; status of the onshore air basin which is adjacentto the OCS air basin in which the proposed OCS facility will be located;status of any other onshore air basin, any portion of which is locatedwithin 25 miles of the OCS facility; and the status of the onshore airbasin where electric power will be produced, if known; population exposurelevels with and without the use of onshore power; loss of recoverable resources;and safety. The electrification analysis shall not consider the costs ofproject design or construction incurred by the applicant prior to the analysis.(iii) The RD shall discuss the analysis with the CAQAC, but the CAQAC shallnot provide formal recommendations or advice to the RD on the analysis.(iv) Based on the information from paragraph (b)(3)(i) through (iii) ofthis section, the RD will determine whether and to what extent a facilityshould be electrified. (4) Initial emission control requirement. OCS BACT for new sources, asapplicable and appropriate, shall be installed on OCS facilities describedin a new Exploration Plan or Development and Production Plan, includingcrew and supply boats when considered part of the facility, and applicablesources during exploration and construction activities. The RD will maintainthe current list of applicable control technologies deemed to be OCS BACT.The lessee may provide justification to the RD showing why an identifiedemission control technology or technologies included on the list as OCSBACT is not OCS BACT for a particular application. The RD shall determineif the control is OCS BACT for the particular application. (5) Air quality review and control. (i) Exploration drilling operations.(A) OCS lessees using an exploration drilling vessel shall install OCSBACT for new sources and OCS RACT for existing sources, as appropriate,on the vessel. By [insert date 3 years from the effective date of thisrule], the OCS RACT performance standard for the main power supply sourceson existing exploration drilling vessels shall be 11 grams per horsepower-hour(g/hphr) for NO<T2>x</T2> emissions. (B) OCS operators that use an exploration drilling vessel with main powersupply sources that emit more than 8 grams per horsepower-hour (g/hphr)for NO<T2>x</T2> emissions after January 1, 1995, shall mitigate the net differencein emissions between the OCS RACT performance standard in effect on January1, 1995, and 8 g/hphr (if the OCS RACT performance standard on January1, 1995, is greater than 8 g/hphr). Once the RD determines that it is feasibleto use only drilling vessels with main power supply sources which emit8 g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2> or less in an OCS air basin, only exploration drilling vesselswith main power supply sources which emit 8 g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2> or less shall be authorized for use in that OCS air basin. Ifthe RD determines that OCS RACT is less than 8 g/hphr, lessees shall useexploration drilling vessels with main power supply sources which complywith the OCS RACT of less than 8 g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2>. (C) No more than 3 exploration operations shall be conducted simultaneouslywithin an area defined by a circle with a radius of 15 miles, drawn withthe initial exploration operation as the center. No two exploration operationsshall be conducted simultaneously at locations which are separated by lessthan 5 miles. When the constraints specified in this paragraph preventa lessee or operator from commencing drilling operations, and an applicableExploration Plan has been submitted in accordance with the provisions ofandSection; 250.33(a) of this title, the lessee or operator may request asuspension of operations, and a suspension of operations shall be granted,pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 250.10 of this title, for a periodof time equal to the period of time that the lessee or operator is preventedfrom commencing exploration drilling operations. (D) The total number of simultaneous exploration operations which may beauthorized in the OCS air basins off the coast of California that are exemptfrom mitigation requirements are presented in Table 1. When the RD determinesthat it is feasible to use only exploration drilling vessels with the mainpower supply sources which emit 8 g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2> or less, the number of exempt exploration operations listedin column a. may be conducted simultaneously. Until the RD makes such adetermination for an OCS air basin, the number of exempt exploration operationslisted in column b. may be conducted simultaneously. (E) No more than 12 exempt exploration operations shall be conducted simultaneouslyin the OCS off California unless and until the RD determines that it isfeasible to use only exploration drilling vessels with mai power supplysources which emit 8  g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2> or less. Once the RD has made such a determination and requiresthe exclusive use of vessels with main power supply sources which emit8 g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2> or less, 16 exempt exploration operations may be conducted simultaneouslyin the OCS off California. (F) The emissions from all non-exempt exploration operations (explorationoperations in excess of the number of exempt simultaneous operations listedin Table 1) shall be fully mitigated at a ratio of 1:1 using the mitigationoptions prescribed in paragraph (a)(5) of this section. (G) The emissions of crew and supply boats while located at a facilityconducting an exploration operation shall be included in the mitigationrequirements, if any, for the exploration operation. The main power supplysources on the crew and supply boats associated with an exploration operationdo not have to meet the 8 g/hphr NO<T2>x</T2> performance standard. <ITAG tagnum="84">Table 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s10,11,11</C><T4>Exempt Simultaneous Exploration Operations for California OCS Air Basins</T4><H1>Air basin category</H1><H1>a. When the main power supply sources emit less than 8 g/hphr NO</H1><T2>x</T2> <H1>b. If the main power supply sources on any vessel emit more than 8g/hp-hr NO</H1><T2>x</T2><ITAG tagnum="1">Attainment<D>4</D><D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nonattainment<D>3</D><D>2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maximum for all</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">OCS basins<D>16</D><D>12</D></ITAG></ITAG>(ii) Ozone Precursors_Construction Activities. (A) The allowable NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC emissions for construction activities associated withan OCS project shall be 25 tons per calendar quarter for OCS air basinsadjacent to onshore attainment areas and 11.5 tons per calendar quarterfor OCS air basins adjacent to onshore nonattainment areas. All NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC emissions from construction activities in excess ofthe allowable levels shall be fully mitigated at a ratio of 1:1 using themitigation options prescribed in andSection; 250.47(a)(5), except as limitedby andSection; 250.47(b)(5)(ii)(B).(B) The maximum annual mitigation requirement for NO<T2>x</T2> and VOC emissions from construction activities associated withan OCS facility will be no greater than the mitigation requirement forthe maximum annual emission level for each pollutant for the development/productionphase of the OCS facility.(iii) Ozone Precursors_Development/Production/Processing Activities. Allfacilities within an OCS air basin adjacent to an onshore area with theclassification shown in column a. of Table 2 or within 25 miles of an onshorearea with the classification shown in column a. of Table 2 with projectedpeak annual emissions for NO<T2>x</T2> or VOC greater than those listed in column b. shall reduce emissionsfor that pollutant below the lowest level given in column c. using thecorresponding offset ratios given in column d. These reductions shall bemade by the mitigation options prescribed in paragraph (a)(5) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="84">Table 2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s10,10,10,10</C> <H1>a. Status of onshore area adjoining an OCS air basin</H1><H1>b. Allowable thresholds for facilities</H1><H1>c. Mitigation level for emissions</H1><H1>d. Offset ratio</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Attainment<D>100 TPY</D><D>100 TPY</D><D>1:1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nonattainment<D>46 TPY</D><D>0 TPY</D><D>1.2:1</D></ITAG></ITAG>(iv) Inerts_Exploration, Construction, and Development/Production Activities.(A) De minimis onshore concentrations. For all facilities or operationswith emissions of TSP, CO, NO<T2>2</T2>, SO<T2>2</T2>, Pb, or PM<T2>10</T2>, the lessee shall use an air quality model and modeling protocolsapproved by the Director, MMS, and consistent with EPA guidelines to determinethe facility's or operation's projected onshore ambient concentrationsof each pollutant in the OCS air basin.(<T3>1</T3>) Attainment/unclassifiable/PM<T2>10</T2> Group 2 and 3 planning areas. The lessee shall mitigate OCSemissions of a pollutant if the projected incremental increase from theOCS facility in an onshore attainment or unclassifiable area for that pollutantexceeds a value in Table 3. The lessee shall use mitigation options inparagraph (a)(5) of this section to reduce the increase below the levelsin Table 3.(<T3>2</T3>) Nonattainment areas/PM<T2>10</T2> Group 1 planning areas. The lessee shall mitigate OCS emissionsof a pollutant from a facility if the predicted incremental increase inan onshore nonattainment area of that pollutant exceeds a value in Table3. The lessee shall use the mitigation options in paragraph (a)(5) of thissection to fully reduce to zero the net emissions from the OCS facility.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>3._<T4>De Minimis Ambient Onshore Thresholds Attainment or Unclassified Area</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[All units are micrograms per cubic meter]</ITAG><H1>Air pollutant</H1><H1>Annual</H1><H1>Calendar quarter</H1><H1>Number of hours</H1><H2>24</H2><H2>8</H2><H2>3</H2><H2>1</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">SO<T2>2</T2><D>1</D><D>_</D><D>5</D><D>_</D><D>25</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">TSP<D>1</D><D>_</D><D>5</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">PM<T2>10</T2><D>1</D><D>_</D><D>5</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NO<T2>2</T2><D>1</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">CO<D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>500</D><D>_</D><D>2,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Pb<D>_</D><D>.05</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><D>_</D></ITAG></ITAG>(B) PSD provisions. For all facilities or operations potentially affectingthe air quality in onshore attainment or unclassifiable areas in amountsin excess of those listed in Table 4, the lessee shall provide baselineinformation for the onshore area affected and shall assess the impact ofthe facility's or operation's primary TSP, NO<T2>x</T2>, or SO<T2>2</T2> emissions on the available PSD increments for that area. Thelessee shall use an air quality model and modeling protocols approved bythe Director, MMS, consistent with EPA guidance, to determine whether theonshore concentrations of TSP, NO<T2>x</T2>, or SO<T2>2</T2> from the facility or operation, in combination with the portionof the PSD increments already consumed, exceed the maximum allowable increasesover the baseline concentrations established pursuant to sections 163 and166 of the CAA in attainment or unclassifiable areas listed in Table 4.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,i1,s10,7,7,6</C><T4>Table </T4>4._<T4>PSD Increments</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[All units are micrograms per cubic meter]</ITAG><H1>Air pollutant</H1><H1>Annual mean \1\</H1><H1>Maximum allowable increases (averaging times)</H1><H2>24-hour</H2><H2>3-hour</H2>Class 1:<ITAG tagnum="2">TSP<D>5.0</D><D>10</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">SO<T2>2</T2><D>2.0</D><D>5</D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">NO<T2>2</T2><D>2.5</D><D>_</D><D>_</D></ITAG>Class 2:<ITAG tagnum="2">TSP<D>19.0</D><D>37</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">SO<T2>2</T2><D>20.0</D><D>91</D><D>512</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">NO<T2>2</T2><D>25.0</D><D>_</D><D>_</D></ITAG>Class 3:<ITAG tagnum="2">TSP<D>37.0</D><D>75</D><D>_</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">SO<T2>2</T2><D>40.0</D><D>182</D><D>700</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">NO<T2>2</T2><D>50.0</D><D>_</D><D>_</D><F>\1\ For TSP: geometric. For NO</F><T2>x</T2> and SO<T2>2</T2>: arithmetic.</ITAG></ITAG>(<T3>1</T3>) If the facility's or operation's emissions of primary TSP orSO<T2>2</T2> cause an exceedance of the available increments, the lesseeshall reduce the emissions of primary TSP, NO<T2>x</T2>, or SO<T2>2</T2> by the mitigation options prescribed in paragraph (a)(5) ofthis section such that the TSP, NO<T2>x</T2>, or SO<T2>2</T2> concentrations in the onshore attainment or unclassifiable areado not exceed the available increments.(<T3>2</T3>) If modeling using the projected emissions of primary TSP orSO<T2>2</T2> from a facility or operation indicates an exceedance of theavailable increments in more than one onshore attainment area, the lesseeshall reduce projected primary TSP or SO<T2>2</T2> emissions to meet the available increments for each onshorearea.(<T3>3</T3>) The RD shall notify and consult appropriate Federal Land Managersof Class 1 areas on a proposed Exploration Plan or Development and ProductionPlan.(6) Toxic air pollutants.(i) The lessee shall calculate for each source and facility the projectedemissions of air pollutants listed in Table 5.(ii) The RD shall determine if a facility specific risk assessment forthe pollutants listed in Table 5 is required.(iii) If a facility specific risk assessment is required, the lessee shallconduct the risk assessment and the RD shall determine the need for furtheremissions controls or other measures and require further emissions controlsor other measures which the RD concludes are necessary and feasible toreduce emissions based on the results of the risk assessment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Table 5</ITAG>Toxic Air Pollutants<ITAG tagnum="81">Benzene</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Formaldehyde</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Chromium</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Nickel</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Polycyclic Aromatic Hydrocarbons (PAH)</ITAG>(7) Modifications to the Protocol Documents and the OCS BACT/RACT lists.The RD shall be able to modify the provisions of the protocol documentsand the OCS BACT/RACT lists, to the extent allowed in the documents, basedon the advice of the CAQAC.(c) <T3>Existing facilities.</T3> All existing facilities, with the exceptionof existing Offshore Storage and Treatment (OSandamp;T) facilities, locatedadjacent to or within 25 miles of an onshore nonattainment areas shallbe required to install OCS RACT before January 17, 1992. All existing facilities,with the exception of existing OSandamp;T facilities, located adjacent toonshore attainment areas shall install OCS RACT only if required as a resultof the periodical cumulative assessment conducted under andSection;250.47(a)(3).Emission reductions realized by the application of RACT on the existingfacilities shall not be used as emission offsets by lessees with the exceptionof emission reductions realized on existing OSandamp;T facilities which shallbe fully available as emission offsets.(d) <T3>Modifications to a facility.</T3> (1) Initial emission control requirements.OCS BACT for new sources and OCS RACT for existing sources, as applicableand appropriate, shall be installed on all modifications to OCS facilitiesor any added source on an OCS facility (excluding boats) which contributesto a net increase in the emissions of any pollutant. The lessee may providejustification to the RD showing why an identified emission control listedas OCS BACT or OCS RACT is not OCS BACT or OCS RACT for a particular application.The RD shall determine if the control is OCS BACT or OCS RACT for the particularapplication.(2) Required information. The lessee shall provide the information requiredat paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section. (3) Emissions level. The cumulative net increase in emissions resultingfrom modifications to a facility shall be calculated for PM<T2>10</T2>, NO<T2>x</T2>, SO<T2>2</T2>, TSP, VOC, and CO. The cumulative net emission threshold shallbe 10 tons per year for all pollutants, with the exception of CO, whichshall be 250 tons per year. (i) Existing facility. If the cumulative net increase in emissions is greaterthan 10 tons per year for any pollutant other than CO (250 tons per yearfor CO), the lessee shall mitigate the cumulative net increase in emissionsfor each such pollutant to zero by the mitigation options prescribed inparagraph (a)(5) of this section. (ii) New facilities. (A) New facilities with initial projected peak annualemissions above the levels in Table 2. If the cumulative modificationsfor a new facility with an initial emission profile projecting a peak annualemission of any pollutant above the applicable level in Table 2 resultin an emissions increase greater than 10 tons per year for that pollutant(250 tons per year for CO), the cumulative net increase in emissions forthat pollutant shall be mitigated to zero by the mitigation options prescribedin paragraph (a)(5) of this section at the applicable offset ratios shownin column d. of Table 2. (B) New facilities with initial projected peak annual emissions below thelevels in Table 2. New facilities which have not exceeded the applicablelevel in Table 2 for the projected peak annual emission of any pollutantshall be allowed modifications which increase the projected peak annualemission of any pollutant to the applicable level in Table 2. When thecumulative modifications to a new facility increase the projected peakannual emission of any pollutant above the applicable level in Table 2,the total future emissions profile for that pollutant shall be mitigatedto zero by the mitigation options prescribed in paragraph (a)(5) of thissection at the applicable offset ratios shown in column d. of Table 2.(iii) When the net cumulative increase in emissions that results from modificationsto a facility have been mitigated to zero or, in the case of a facilitymeeting the requirements of paragraph (d)(3)(ii) of this section, whenthe total future emissions profile is mitigated to zero, the facility willbe allowed a new cumulative net emission threshold for future modificationsof not more than 10 tons per year for any pollutant (250 tons per yearfor CO).<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-MR-M001</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration 134</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-MR-C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="75">Appendix B to 30 CFR 250.47_Protocol for the Analysis of ElectrificationConfigurations for OCS Projects</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">1.0 Purpose</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The purpose of this Facility Electrification Protocol is to outlineelements for an analysis by the lessee of various project configurationsto supply electricity to the project and a procedure to be used by theMMS Pacific OCS Regional RD in determining to what extent, if any, electricityfrom onshore sources should be required for the project. The procedurespecified herein, including standardized factors, must be followed to ensurethat all OCS projects are regulated in a consistent manner. Exceptionsmay be approved by the RD, where specifically allowed in the protocol orto account for differences in project design or documented operating procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">2.0 General Analysis Procedure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The requirements for facility electrification are to be determinedon an incremental basis compared to a defined base case for power productionand heat supply. A range of scenarios for facility electrification shallbe examined, including the six scenarios listed in Exhibit 1. All listedscenarios should be considered in an initial screening analysis. The ``basecase'' represents facility power and heat supply equipment which is BACTfor reducing emissions. Any modifications to the scope, nature, or numberof scenarios analyzed must be approved by the RD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The analysis, as outlined in this protocol, will result in the netpresent value (NPV) cost of electrification options on an incremental basisfrom the base case. The NPV is then normalized by the total lifetime emissionreduction. The costs of the scenarios, per unit emission reduction, arethen compared to threshold criteria. Any costs incurred by the applicantfor design or fabrication prior to the completion of the electrificationdetermination shall be disregarded in the NPV cost calculations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The sample calculations presented in these guidelines show unit costsof electrification in terms of NO<T2>x</T2> reduction only. Reactive hydrocarbons shall also be considered,as specified herein. Calculations will be prepared for NO<T2>x</T2>, SO<T2>2</T2>, and PM<T2>10</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The major elements and assumptions required to determine the costof each facility electrification scenario are:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; <T3>Project design basis</T3>_Engineering basis and assumptions for determiningequipment sizes and operating requirements. This information is project-specificand must be supplied by the operator with agency verifiable documentation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; <T3>Capital cost estimating technique</T3>_Guidelines and methods for estimatingcapital cost. This information is project-specific and must be suppliedby the operator with agency verifiable documentation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; <T3>Operating requirements</T3>_This element includes both the avoidedand additional operating requirements of each electrification scenario.This data is project-specific and must be supplied by the operator withagency verifiable documentation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; <T3>Operating and maintenance cost factors</T3>_This element includes thebasis, sources, and current values for operating and maintenance unit costs.These cost factors are standardized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; <T3>Financial analysis parameters</T3>_This element includes the sourcesand basis for the parameters to be used in the financial analysis. Thesefactors are standardized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; <T3>Emission factors</T3>_Includes sources and methods for determiningemissions for the various emitting equipment items. The factors can beproject-specific if actual equipment is known and verifiable vendor datais available.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.1 Facility Electrification Analysis Input Values </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Input paramaters have been divided into two major categories. Thefirst are those parameters that are standardized. The second are project-specificinputs that must be supplied by an operator to conduct the electrificationanalysis. The various elements that comprise each of these categories arediscussed below.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.1.1 Standardized Input Values</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The standardized input values are the operating and maintenance unitcost parameters and the financial analysis parameters. Exhibit 2 providesa list of the required operating and maintenance cost parameters neededto conduct the electrification analysis. The exhibit presents the typicalrange of values for each parameter as well as the recommended value thatshould be used for each analysis. Some of the operating and maintenancefactors could vary by project due to each company's operating practices.If an operator wishes to use an operating and maintenance (Oandamp;M) valuedifferent than the recommended value, they must submit with their analysisthe necessary back-up information to justify use of the different values.Where Oandamp;M values differ due to past operating practices, these practicesmust be identified in written procedures used previously by the company.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exhibit 3 provides a list of the required financial analysis parameters.This list includes escalation factors for electricity and gas prices. Utilitiesusually forecast real and nominal price forecasts. The real forecast shouldbe used to develop the price escalation above and beyond inflation, sincethe utilities general inflation forecast may be different from that whichis recommended here. Use of these cost parameters will allow the determinationof the cost effectiveness of various facility electrification scenarioson a consistent basis. Financial factors shall not be modified based onapplicant specific data. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.1.2 Project-Specific Input Values </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The project-specific input values fall into three categories. Theseare: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Project Design Basis Parameters. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Equipment Capital Costs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Emission Factors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">These categories are considered project-specific since they may allvary depending on the facility's location, design, and quantity and qualityof resources to be recovered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exhibit 4 presents the key elements that must be known about the designof the facility in order to properly evaluate facility electrification.An applicant must supply the data shown in Exhibit 4 as part of the analysis.This information shall then be independently verified by MMS. Using thedesign basis information provided and verified, the required incrementalfacility modifications can be determined for each scenario. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exhibit 5 shows the major elements that are used to estimate the capitalcosts associated with each scenario. In costing the major equipment items,budget quotes should be supplied from vendors. Three quotes are desirableto establish accurate preliminary cost estimates. Other direct costs, suchas installation engineering, shall be estimated using standard engineeringcost factors. For some of the special offshore installation activities,the costs should be developed separately. As a part of any capital costestimate, a project contingency factor of 20 percent shall be added tocover the uncertainty inherent in any preliminary cost estimate. This isconsidered standard engineering practice. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All of the assumptions and back-up data used to develop the capitalcost estimates for each electrification scenario are to be submitted withthe analysis. This back-up shall include: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Equipment specifications; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Vendor cost quotes for major equipment items; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; A list of all factors used to estimate other direct materialsand installation costs and their sources; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Any other costing assumptions used in the analysis and thesource for these assumptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Providing this level of back-up will allow regulators to verify theaccuracy and completeness of each scenario's incremental capital cost.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The third major category of project-specific input parameters is theemission factors. Many of the factors will vary depending on design ofthe facility and the actual equipment to be used on the facility. Exhibit6 provides a list of the sources and methodologies that shall be used toestimate emission factors. Data supplied by vendors should include back-uptest data consistent with that required for enforceable permit conditions.When vendor data is not available, then EPA-approved factors shall be used.As part of each applicant's facility electrification analysis, the sourceof emission factors by equipment should be provided. If the source is vendordata, the actual data provided by the vendor should be provided as back-up.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The reduction in recoverable reserves may be considered in the calculationof facility electrification feasibility if the reduction in recoverableresources exceeds 5 percent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.2 Cost Calculations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To aid in the determination of the costs, a list of the various componentswhich should be considered for each scenario is given in Exhibit 7. Costsfor each of these items are to be estimated using the annual operatingrequirements and the appropriate unit costs adjusted for inflation andescalation. The annual operating requirements represent the differencebetween each scenario and the base case. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The overall sequence in the cost calculations is as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Establish annual operating requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Identify peak equipment duties and the design basis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Develop equipment specifications from the design basis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Estimate capital investment from equipment specifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Escalate unit costs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Calculate annual costs from annual operating requirements andescalated unit costs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Discount the costs for each year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Sum the discounted annual costs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Calculate annual NO<T2>x</T2> and ROC emissions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Identify the cost for reduction of NO<T2>x</T2> in $/ton (Net Present Value). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In calculating the NPV cost for NO<T2>x</T2> reduction, the portion of the costs attributable to RHC reductionshall be deducted from the NPV cost. The deducted amount shall be calculatedby multiplying the NPV cost times the ratio of total tons RHC to totaltons RHC + NO<T2>x</T2>. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">2.3 Method for Considering Onshore Cogeneration Costs and Emissions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the onshore cogeneration scenario results in the purchase of offsets,not otherwise required under the base case, a cost and emission reductionfactor shall be incorporated into the electrification analysis for thisscenario. The cost factor shall be calculated as the dollars per ton timesthe additional tons of offsets purchased under the cogeneration scenario.An emission reduction factor shall be incorporated by subtracting the annualtons of offsets which must be purchased for the onshore cogeneration scenariofrom the annual tons of emissions computed for that scenario. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The net result of the cost calculation can be represented in a tableshowing the total incremental NO<T2>x</T2> emission reduction for each scenario, its associated averagecost ($ per ton removed), and total cost. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">3.0 Identifying Feasible Scenarios </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A three-step process will be used by the RD for the identificationof feasible electrification scenarios: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Rank order the scenarios in ascending cost per ton of pollutantremoved. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Discard any option which has a lower pollutant reduction thanits adjacent higher ranked (lower cost) neighbor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) An option is feasible if its cost per ton of pollutant removedis less than the threshold criteria on a total basis. The RD shall considerthe costs of offshore BACT, onshore BACT, and onshore offsets in settingthe threshold criteria. The CAQAC will recommend an appropriate level forthis criteria for each air basin. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit</T4> 1._<T4>Scenarios To Be Analyzed </T4><H1>Scenario </H1><H1>Design and operation objectives </H1><H1>Equipment configuration</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1. ``Base Case'' On-facility Turbines with Water Injection (as example)<D>Project is completely self-sufficient for its thermal and electricalenergy requirements. An energy efficient system, gas turbine generatorwith waste heat recovery, is combined with NO</D><T2>x</T2> control, water injection. Electric motor drives for all majorequipment including the drilling rig and all but one crane. Gas compressorswill be powered by the GTG <D>Project Gas Turbines. </D><P>Waste Heat Recovery Units. </P><P>Diesel Generators Emergency Drilling Standby. </P><P>Diesel-Firing of Gas Turbines when gas production is insufficient. </P><P>Gas Processing: </P><P/>Dehydration-Glyol. <P/>Sweetening-Amine. <P>Desalinization Unit for Water Injection. </P><P>Gas Compressors. </P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Partial Utility Grid Connection <D>Operate GTG and HRU at maximum efficiency, matching output to the lowerof the thermal or electrical demand at peak production and using grid poweror supplemental firing to meet the balance of the platform's energy demand.Operation of GTG normally at full load </D><D>Same as for base case, except some equipment items may be smaller dueto lower loads. </D><P>Onshore Utility Substation. </P><P>34.5 KV Subsea Transmission Line. </P><P>Electrical Tie-in on platform (transformer, switch gear, etc.). </P><P>Supplemental Firing for HRU. </P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Full Utility Grid Connection with Gas-Fired Process Heaters <D>Utility to provide all electrical power requirements; thermal demandsatisfied by gas-fired heaters. Project generation capacity is only foremergency_complete standby not available </D><D>Base case equipment not required: </D><P/>Project Gas Turbines. <P/>Waste Heat Recovery Unit. <P/>Desalinization Unit. <P/>Auxiliary Equipment. <P>Some base case equipment is downsized: </P><P/>Glycol Contractor. <P/>Amine Scrubber. <P>Additional Equipment: </P><P/>34.5 KV Subsea Transmission Line. <P/>Gas-Fired Process Heater with low NO<T2>x</T2> burners. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Full Utility Grid Connection with Electrical Process Heaters <D>Same as for Scenario 3, except process thermal demand to be satisfiedby electrical instead of gas-fired process heaters </D><D>Base case equipment not required: </D><P/>Project Gas Turbines. <P/>Waste Heat Recovery Units. <P/>Desalinization Units. <P/>Gas Processing: <P/>Glycol Contractor. <P/>Amine Scrubber. <P>Additional equipment required: </P><P/>Onshore Utility Substation. <P/>34.5 KV Subsea Transmission Line. <P/>Electrical Process Heater. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Onshore Cogeneration with Gas-Fired Process Heaters <D>Same as for Scenario 3, except power is provided by an onshore cogenerationfacility </D><D>Base case equipment not required: </D><P/>Project Gas Turbines. <P/>Waste Heat Recovery Unit. <P/>Desalinization Unit. <P/>Auxiliary Equipment. <P>Some base case equipment is downsized: </P><P/>Glycol Contractors. <P/>Amine Scrubber. <P>Additional Equipment: </P><P/>34.5 KV Subsea Transmission Line. <P/>Electrical Tie-in on facility. <P/>Gas-Fired Process Heater with low NO<T2>x</T2> burners. <P>Electrical Substation. </P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Onshore Cogeneration with Electrical Process Heaters <D>Same as for Scenario 5, except process thermal demand to be satisfiedby electrical instead of gas-fired process heaters </D><D>Base case equipment not required: </D><P/>Project Gas Turbines. <P/>Waste Heat Recovery Units. <P/>Desalinization Units. <P/>Gas Processing: <P/>Glycol Contractor. <P/>Amine Scrubber. <P>Additional equipment required: </P><P/>34.5 KV Subsea Transmission Line. <P/>Electric Process Heater. <P>Electrical Substation.</P></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit </T4>2._<T4>Operating and Maintenance Unit Cost Parameters </T4><H1>Cost item</H1><H1>Value range</H1><H1>Recommended value </H1><H1>Units </H1><H1>Basis</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Project Fuel Gas<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D/><D>NGPA Section 109 less royalty.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utility Power<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D/><D>Lower of actual published rate schedule for uninterruptible industrialpower or rate commitment by serving utilities.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diesel Fuel<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D>$/gal</D><D>West Coast price as published in Oil Buyers Guide.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Turbine Oandamp;M<D>6 to 10</D><D>8</D><D>mils/kwh</D><D>For onshore applications.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Water Injection<D>0.5 to 3</D><D>1</D><D>mils/kwh</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SCR Oandamp;M<D>1 to 4</D><D>2</D><D>mils/kwh</D><D>Excluding catalyst changeout.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Catalyst Changeout<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D/><D>Assumed to occur at least every 2 years. Price of changeout to be obtainedfrom vendor.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas-Fired Heater Maintenance<D>3 to 5 percent </D><D>4 percent</D><D>of equipment cost</D><D>Annually.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Electrical Equipment Maintenance<D>0.5 to 3 percent</D><D>1.5 percent</D><D>of equipment cost</D><D>Annually.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ammonia and Feed System<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D/><D>To be determined_factored based on ammonia price plus transportationand handling.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas Processing and Compression Oandamp;M<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D/><D>To be determined.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Onshore Cogeneration Fuel Gas<D>NA</D><D>NA</D><D/><D>NGPA Section 109 less royalty.\1\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Onshore Cogeneration Oandamp;M<D>2 to 6</D><D>4</D><D>mils/kwh</D><D>For onshore application.</D><F>\1\ Royalty costs shall not be included in onshore cogeneration fuelgas costs to the extent generated power is used by project (onshore oroffshore) and cogeneration unit is under same ownership, if approved bythe MMS. Where cogeneration unit is proposed to be under other ownership,applicants shall request royalty waiver, and MMS shall act on waiver request,prior to determining an applicant's electrification requirements.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit </T4>3._<T4>Financial Analysis Parameters</T4><H1>Parameter </H1><H1>Values as of September 1987 (percent) </H1><H1>Basis</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Long-term inflation <D>4-5 </D><D>The DOC published forecast for CPIU (Consumer Price Index, Urban).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Electricity price escalation <D>NA </D><D>Real price increase forecasted by actual utility.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas price escalation <D>NA </D><D>Real price increase forecasted by utility providing standby serviceor GNP de-escalator per Section 109.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Discount rate <D> </D><D>As required by SEC for valuation of reserves (code reference to be included).</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Project financing technique <D>NA </D><D>Assumed to be 100 percent operator's equity.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit </T4>4._<T4>Key Elements for the Design Basis for Determining Project ElectrificationFeasibility</T4><H1>Item </H1><H1>Issues</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Project Electrical Demand <D>Both peak demand (kw) and annual consumption (KWH) need to be determined.For verification, the annual consumption can be compared to gas compressionpower requirements, independently estimated from the gas production curvesand compression calculations. Typically, gas compression accounts for approximately70 to 80 percent of facility power requirements for production. The balanceof the power demand can be verified by engineering assessment of loadsbased upon the one-line diagram and equipment operating schedules and loads.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Project Thermal Demand <D>Both peak demand (106 Btu/hr) and annual consumption (106 Btu) needto be determined. For verification, the annual consumption can be comparedto the oil heating requirements, independently estimated from the oil productioncurves and the oil pumping temperatures. Typically, oil heating accountsfor approximately 80 percent of the project thermal requirements. The balanceof the thermal demand can be verified by engineering assessment of theenergy balances and process flow diagrams.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offshore Utility Grid Network <D>An offshore utility grid network, which could serve several OCS facilitiesat a lower capital cost than an individual connection, might be availablefor some projects.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas Lift vs. Downhole Submersible Pumps <D>An operators choice of production enhancement technique can significantlyaffect a project's electrical demand. Submersible pumps are more energyefficient; a selection of gas lift can be justified based upon technicaland financial feasibility as well as safety and operability considerations.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Non-Electric Equipment Drives <D>The base case assumes electric motor drives for all major equipmentwhere prudent, including gas compressors and drilling rigs. It is assumedthat diesel engines are used for emergency items, such as emergency generatorsor a firewater pump and one crane.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Engineering Assumptions <D>A variety of engineering assumptions need to be specified in conductingthe feasibility assessment. These assumptions can include turbine heatrate, process heater efficiency, fuel heating value, gas compression power,subsea power losses, etc. These values are site-specific, and data shouldbe provided for each project evaluated.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit 5._</T4><T4>Capital Cost Estimating Techniques</T4><H1>Item</H1><H1>Estimating techniques</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Major Equipment Items<D>Major equipment items should be specified to a degree which allows forbudget quotes from vendors. While three vendor quotes are desirable onall major items, it is recognized that this is not always possible dueto product differences or vendor capabilities.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other Direct Materials<D>Can be estimated using published factors based upon major equipmentcosts.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Installation Costs<D>Can be estimated using published offshore factors. Special equipment,e.g., cable lay vessel, should be costed separately.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deck Space Allocation at Facility<D>If site-specific data are not available, they can be estimated at $1,000/squarefoot.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Project Indirect Costs<D>Can be estimated using published engineering cost factors.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Contingency<D>A contingency of 20 percent is consistent with the outlined approachto capital cost estimation.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit </T4>6._<T4>Emission Factor Sources</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas Turbine_Fuel Gas <D>Vendor data or certified tests on same model with same amount of waterinjection, site rated.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas Turbine_Diesel Firing <D>Vendor data or certified tests on same model, site rated.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas-Fired Process Heater <D>Vendor data, or AP-42 values.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Utility Emissions <D>ARB approved cogeneration Utility Displacement Credit Methodology.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">SCR Performance (if onshore (cogeneration facility)) <D>Vendor data.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cogeneration Unit <D>Vendor data or certified tests on same model, site rated.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other Equipment <D>Vendor data or AP-42 values.</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Exhibit </T4>7._<T4>Operating and Maintenance Requirements for Various ElectrificationScenarios</T4><H1>Scenario </H1><H1>Base Case Requirements which are Avoided or Reduced </H1><H1>Additional Operating Requirements</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Partial Utility Grid Connection <D>Gas Turbine Fuel Gas</D><P>Gas Turbine Oandamp;M</P><P>Injection Water</P><P>Gas Processing </P><D>Utility Power</D><P>Electrical Oandamp;M</P><P>Gas Compression Oandamp;M</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Full Utility Grid Connection with Gas-Fired Process Heaters <D>Gas Turbine Fuel Gas</D><P>Gas Turbine Diesel Fuel</P><P>Gas Turbine Oandamp;M</P><P>Injection Water</P><P>Gas Processing</P><P>Deck Space and Structural Requirements </P><D>Utility Power</D><P>Heater Fuel Gas</P><P>Heater Oandamp;M</P><P>Electrical Oandamp;M </P><P>Gas Compression Oandamp;M</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Full Utility Grid Connection with Electric Process Heaters <D>Gas Turbine Fuel Gas</D><P>Gas Turbine Diesel Fuel</P><P>Gas Turbine Oandamp;M</P><P>Injection Water</P><P>Gas Processing</P><P>Deck Space and Structural Requirements </P><D>Utility Power</D><P>Heater Oandamp;M</P><P>Electrical Oandamp;M</P><P>Gas Compression Oandamp;M</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5. Onshore Cogeneration with Gas-Fired Process Heaters<D>Gas Turbine Fuel Gas</D><P>Gas Turbine Diesel Fuel</P><P>Gas Turbine Oandamp;M</P><P>Injection Water</P><P>Gas Processing</P><P>Deck Space and Structural Requirements </P><D>Cogeneration Fuel Gas</D><P>Cogeneration Oandamp;M</P><P>Heater Fuel Gas</P><P>Heater Oandamp;M</P><P>Electrical Oandamp;M</P><P>Gas Compression Oandamp;M</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Onshore Cogeneration with Electric Process Heaters <D>Gas Turbine Fuel Gas</D><P>Gas Turbine Diesel Fuel</P><P>Gas Turbine Oandamp;M</P><P>Injection Water</P><P>Gas Processing</P><P>Deck Space and Structural Requirements </P><D>Cogeneration Fuel Use</D><P>Cogeneration Oandamp;M</P><P>Heater Oandamp;M</P><P>Electrical Oandamp;M</P><P>Gas Compression Oandamp;M</P></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-773 Filed 1-13-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-MR-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>